http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/ID_CALDER_SHOOTINGS_WAOL-?SITE=MOJOP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT The Joplin Globe - Online Edition The Joplin Globe • 117 E. Fourth St. • Joplin, MO 64801 • (417) 623-3480 • (800) 444-8514 • Fax [417] 623-8450 9 Days in Haiti Advertise with The Globe May 11, 8:10 AM EDT Three dead in apparent homicide-suicide in north Idaho CALDER, Idaho (AP) -- An elderly couple and a younger man were found dead and a woman survived a head wound after being shot at a remote house outside this north Idaho hamlet, Shoshone County sheriff's deputies said. Deputies gave few details early Friday, but neighbors said a distraught man had wounded his estranged wife, killed her parents and committed suicide Thursday evening in a small wooden house a few hundred yards from the nearest dwellings. Sheriff's Sgt. Derek Dofelmire told The Associated Press the survivor was Rose Turner and one of the dead was Ricky Turner. He would not identify the elderly man and woman. Rose Turner was "very lucky" to be alive and was flown to Sacred Heart Medical Center in Spokane, Wash., where "she has been able to provide information to our investigators," Dofelmire said. More than one gun was recovered at the scene, he added. Shoshone and Benewah deputies closed a road off U.S. Forest Service Road 50, the St. Joe River Road, in the Idaho Panhandle about two miles east of Calder and 65 miles east-southeast of Spokane. Neighbors told The Spokesman-Review of Spokane and KXLY and KREM Television that Ricky Turner is Rose Turner's estranged husband and committed suicide after shooting her and her parents. The Turners had three children, Ricky Turner was disabled, Rose Turner worked at a nursing home and her parents lived with her at the house, one neighbor, Julie "Tiny" Codoni, told the newspaper. She said Ricky Turner was despondent over their divorce, which was scheduled to take effect Thursday. When she talked to him Wednesday, "he was in really bad shape. He was hurting," Codoni said. "He loved her. She was his life." 2003 The Joplin Globe Publishing Company. Terms of use for this service. Read our privacy guidelines.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_BESTIALITY_CHARGE_WAOL-?SITE=MOJOP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT The Joplin Globe - Online Edition The Joplin Globe • 117 E. Fourth St. • Joplin, MO 64801 • (417) 623-3480 • (800) 444-8514 • Fax [417] 623-8450 9 Days in Haiti Advertise with The Globe May 11, 1:41 AM EDT Jury acquits WA man of bestiality charge TACOMA, Wash. (AP) -- A Pierce County jury has acquitted a man accused of having sex with the family dog. Michael Patrick McPhail, 26, of Spanaway, was found not guilty Wednesday in Pierce County Superior Court of first-degree animal cruelty. Assistant Pierce County Prosecutor Karen Watson said last fall that McPhail was the first person charged in the county under a new state law that made bestiality a felony. "I'm glad that justice was able to see it wasn't an action of my doing," McPhail said as he left the court building. He said he believes his wife made up the story because she is seeking to end their marriage. It was Jesika McPhail who contacted police and told them she'd caught her husband engaged in sexual intercourse with their pit bull, Sara, last October. Jesika McPhail was not immediately available for comment about the verdict. The case generated outrage among animal welfare advocates across the globe, many of whom called for McPhail to be prosecuted to the fullest extent of the law. Deputy Prosecutor Brian Leech, who tried the case, said he was disappointed. "Obviously, I thought the facts were more than sufficient to merit a conviction," Leech said. "The defense was able to introduce some evidence about strife in the marriage. I don't think that was supported, but apparently the jury gave it some weight." The new law, which took effect last June, was prompted by a case in which a Seattle man died after having sex with a horse. Before the law was enacted, Washington was among roughly a dozen states where bestiality had not been explicitly prohibited. Information from: The News Tribune, 2003 The Joplin Globe Publishing Company. Terms of use for this service. Read our privacy guidelines.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/O/OR_BRF_SMALL_PLANE_CRASH_WAOL-?SITE=MOJOP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT The Joplin Globe - Online Edition The Joplin Globe • 117 E. Fourth St. • Joplin, MO 64801 • (417) 623-3480 • (800) 444-8514 • Fax [417] 623-8450 9 Days in Haiti Advertise with The Globe May 10, 9:24 PM EDT Two die in plane crash near Idaho-Oregon border NYSSA, Ore. (AP) -- An experimental plane crashed Thursday in a field near the Idaho border, killing the two men aboard, authorities said. The victims, both experienced pilots, were Lyndon Wheeler, 57, and Orville "Vard" Olsen, 71, both of Nyssa, said Malheur County Undersheriff Brian Wolfe. A farm worker said he heard the plane fly over, but did not hear anything that would indicate it was having problems before it nose-dived and crashed into the field, officials said. Federal Aviation Administration investigators from Boise, Idaho, headed to the scene, KTVB-TV of Boise reported. 2003 The Joplin Globe Publishing Company. Terms of use for this service. Read our privacy guidelines.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_PROSECUTORS_MCKAY_WAOL-?SITE=MOJOP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT The Joplin Globe - Online Edition The Joplin Globe • 117 E. Fourth St. • Joplin, MO 64801 • (417) 623-3480 • (800) 444-8514 • Fax [417] 623-8450 9 Days in Haiti Advertise with The Globe May 10, 4:16 PM EDT Gonzales 'not aware' of DOJ using Wales killing to explain firing AP Legal Affairs Writer SEATTLE (AP) -- Attorney General Alberto Gonzales acknowledged Thursday there was a "great deal of concern" in some quarters about former U.S. Attorney John McKay's handling of election fraud allegations during the 2004 election in Washington state. But he said he doesn't know if that's why McKay was placed on a list of U.S. attorneys to be fired in March 2005. Testifying before the House Judiciary Committee in the nation's capital, Gonzales also said he didn't know if McKay might have been fired because he pushed for appropriate resources to investigate the slaying of Assistant U.S. Attorney Thomas Wales. Kyle Sampson, Gonzales' former chief of staff and the person who compiled the list of prosecutors to be fired, raised the possibility in a closed-door interview with congressional investigators last month that McKay made the list for pushing too hard on the Wales investigation, from which his office is recused. McKay has called that suggestion "mind-numbing." Wales was shot to death as he worked in his basement the night of Oct. 11, 2001. "If that was a reason why he was included as part of the recommended group, that's something you'd have to ask others involved in this process," Gonzales said in response to questioning from Rep. Mel Watt, D-N.C. "I'm not aware the department, however, is using that as a reason or excuse." Gonzales said he learned about concerns related to the Wales case "very, very recently." "Yeah, he wasn't aware of it until Kyle Sampson made it up," McKay said after learning of the attorney general's comments. Watt pressed Gonzales on whether the real reason McKay made the list were allegations that he should have brought claims of election fraud in the 2004 election, won after two recounts by Democrat Chris Gregoire, to a grand jury. Gonzales said he doesn't recall such concerns being in his mind when he agreed to fire McKay. "I don't recall that when I accepted the recommendation that that was a reason for it, was his efforts with respect to voter fraud," Gonzales said. "But clearly, going back and looking at the documents, there was a great deal of concern with his efforts with respect to voter fraud because I received a number of letters from groups and outside parties ...." Watt interrupted: "So you didn't fire him for that reason, but somebody might have put him on the list for that reason. That's really what you're saying, Mr. Attorney General." "I'm assuming that this committee has spoken with everyone who provided input, and of course the person who was compiling the information, Mr. Sampson, would know better than I," Gonzales replied. Watt started his questioning by noting that in testimony on April 19, Gonzales said McKay was fired for the way he pursued an information-sharing project and for comments he made to the Seattle Post-Intelligencer citing his concerns about budget cuts and unfilled positions in his office. In reality, McKay's appearance on the March 2005 hit list long predated those issues, which didn't arise until last summer. "Are you aware of any legitimate reason that John McKay should have been forced out as a United States attorney in March 2005, as opposed to the things you talked about that occurred in 2006?" Watt asked. "I would have to go back and look at that, U.S. Rep.," Gonzales said. Gonzales agreed that it would be improper if McKay were pressured to bring an unwarranted election fraud investigation, but also suggested there might have been some legitimacy to the claims raised by GOP groups in the state. He said his office did receive several letters complaining about McKay. At a Seattle University Law School forum on Wednesday, McKay said he himself had concerns about the state's conduct of the 2004 election. But there was absolutely no actual evidence of fraud, he said. 2003 The Joplin Globe Publishing Company. Terms of use for this service. Read our privacy guidelines.
http://hosted.ap.org/ News from The Associated Press
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_POWER_PLANT_WAOL-?SITE=MOJOP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT The Joplin Globe - Online Edition The Joplin Globe • 117 E. Fourth St. • Joplin, MO 64801 • (417) 623-3480 • (800) 444-8514 • Fax [417] 623-8450 9 Days in Haiti Advertise with The Globe May 10, 8:21 PM EDT Energy Northwest asks WA to delay proposed power plant review OLYMPIA, Wash. (AP) -- Energy Northwest has asked the state to delay its permitting review of a proposed $1.5 billion power plant in Kalama following passage of a new climate change bill. Gov. Chris Gregoire last week signed the bill into law, barring Washington utilities from signing long-term contracts with coal-fired power plants that produce excessive greenhouse gases. Greenhouse gases, including carbon dioxide, methane and other gases, essentially trap energy from the sun, which warms the Earth's surface and lower atmosphere. Many scientists believe human activity that increases those gases is contributing to global warming. Energy Northwest, a public power consortium based in Richland, Wash., asked the state Energy Facility Site Evaluation Council in a letter Tuesday to delay its permitting process. The consortium said it wants to wait and see how regulators plan to limit heat-trapping gases. "We don't mean to signal in any way we're walking away from the project," Energy Northwest spokesman Brad Peck said. "We're as committed to this project as the day it started." The new law directs state and federal agencies, electric utilities and "public interest representatives" to write regulations limiting emissions such as carbon dioxide. The state must adopt the rules by June 30, 2008. Energy Northwest urged state regulators to try to adopt the rules by midsummer so it can decide whether to forge ahead or abandon its proposed 680-megawatt coal gasification plant. The project would use coal or petcoke, the waste product from oil refineries, that would be turned into a gas to be burned to generate power. The plant could also burn natural gas. The new law allowed projects like the proposed plant five years to "sequester" carbon dioxide emissions underground. Otherwise, emissions would have to be offset through drastic measures, such as buying a dirty power plant and shutting it down. Energy Northwest has been participating in a study to inject emissions into basalt, which is common in the region. But the utility said it isn't sure five years will be enough time to determine the feasibility of that technique. Moreover, either option for curbing greenhouse gas emissions could significantly increase the cost of power from the project. Energy Northwest wants to know how the law will be implemented before it takes the project to potential customers for financial commitments. Given the uncertainty surrounding implementation of the law and the time required to build major power generation plants, "we must immediately begin looking at alternative options for regional power supplies," Energy Northwest Vice President Jack Baker wrote in the letter. Environmentalists say the delay request could be the beginning of the end for the project. "I think it's a prudent move on their part," said Marc Krasnowsky, a spokesman for the Northwest Energy Coalition. "I think they've concluded their public utility customers are likely to be spending a lot more for the power from the proposed plant than they had expected to." Energy Northwest, which includes 20 public utilities and municipalities, operates a nuclear power plant near Richland and a hydropower project, as well as wind, solar and biomass power projects. The state energy council is in the midst of a year-plus review of the application for the proposed plant. The council then makes a recommendation to the governor, who has the final say on whether large power plants are approved. 2003 The Joplin Globe Publishing Company. Terms of use for this service. Read our privacy guidelines.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_HERITAGE_25TH_WAOL-?SITE=MOJOP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT The Joplin Globe - Online Edition The Joplin Globe • 117 E. Fourth St. • Joplin, MO 64801 • (417) 623-3480 • (800) 444-8514 • Fax [417] 623-8450 9 Days in Haiti Advertise with The Globe May 10, 10:02 PM EDT Heritage University celebrates 25 years TOPPENISH, Wash. (AP) -- Heritage University celebrates its 25th graduating class Saturday, a milestone for the Yakima Valley's first four-year college - created by three women to improve educational opportunities for the region's multicultural population. Kathleen Ross, the school's president since it began offering undergraduate and graduate degrees in 1982, called the silver anniversary "a glorious milestone" that represents a wave of graduates who have ventured out to build the future. She also said the milestone signifies that "we can think even more creatively and expansively for the next 25 years." Originally known as Heritage College, the school was founded in 1981 by Ross, a Catholic nun, and two Yakama Nation tribal members as a successor to Spokane's Fort Wright College. The school began offering degrees a year later as an independent, nonprofit college with only a handful of students and staff and a few modest buildings and trailers surrounded by hops fields about 20 miles southeast of Yakima. The school became Heritage University in August 2004. Enrollment has grown to more than 1,500 students, and the school has regional sites in several cities, including Yakima, Omak, Wenatchee and Moses Lake. From the beginning, the mission has been to bring a quality liberal arts education to a multicultural population. Some 6,000 degrees have been conferred since the school's founding. At Saturday's commencement, 374 degrees will be awarded. "This is celebrating 25 years of support and generosity from the community and bringing education to people who couldn't ordinarily afford it," said Bill Rich, a retired Yakima businessman and member of the university board of directors. "Heritage has been an outstanding success, and the best is yet to come," he said. Heritage extends undergraduate degrees in business, the humanities, computer science, scientific disciplines, nursing, education, psychology, math and social work. Graduate degrees are also available. At the conclusion of commencement Saturday, the Class of 2007 will release white doves to commemorate the anniversary. Graduates say it's a fitting metaphor for a school that has risen above all expectations. Special events also have been planned throughout the year to highlight the anniversary. Information from: Yakima Herald-Republic, 2003 The Joplin Globe Publishing Company. Terms of use for this service. Read our privacy guidelines.
http://apdigitalnews.com/privacy.html AP Digital | Terms of Use
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_WASHINGTON_MARRIAGE_WAOL-?SITE=MOJOP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT The Joplin Globe - Online Edition The Joplin Globe • 117 E. Fourth St. • Joplin, MO 64801 • (417) 623-3480 • (800) 444-8514 • Fax [417] 623-8450 9 Days in Haiti Advertise with The Globe May 11, 8:50 AM EDT Marriage and divorce rates at two-decade low in Washington state SEATTLE (AP) -- Marriage and divorce rates are at a two-decade low in Washington state, and experts are divided on the reason. The state recorded fewer divorces in 2004 than in 1986 despite a 1.7 million population increase, and that's in line with a national trend. The nation's divorce rate, which shot upward following the widespread adoption of state no-fault divorce laws starting in the 1960s to a peak of 5.3 divorces per 1,000 people in 1981, has since fallen to 3.6. In Washington the decline from 1986 to 2004 was from 5.9 to 4.2. "If you have fewer marriages, you are going to have fewer divorces.," said Pepper Schwartz, a University of Washington sociologist. More couples now live together without getting married, and "you can't get divorced unless you are married," Schwartz said. Others note that many couples wait longer to get married, so they have more time to mature and get to know each other. The result, some say, is more durable marriages. Other marriage experts cite a "divorce divide," saying divorce rates are falling substantively among college-educated couples but not among less affluent and less educated couples. "Families with two earners with good jobs have seen an improvement in their standard of living, which leads to less tension at home and lower probability of divorce," said Andrew Cherlin, a professor of public policy at Johns Hopkins University. "People are getting married later now than they ever have, and cohabitation is on the rise," said Les Parrott, co-founder of the Center for Relationship Development at Seattle Pacific University. "So many (young couples) are feeling unprepared for it. They've seen plenty of examples of how marriage doesn't work, so they put it off." With a long engagement, "the couple gets along better," said Heather Edy, owner of Wedding Bell Bliss Bridal Consultation in Seattle. "I truly believe they're more compatible for marriage." Edy, 28, is a fair example. In August she plans to marry Clint Sharpe, 30, whom she has dated for four years and to whom she got engaged on Valentine's Day last year. Nikelle Rosier, a marriage educator and couples therapist in Seattle, said her clients are displaying "more intentionality" in marriage decisions. "What's interesting is that a lot of clients met through Match.com," she said. "They're picking a mate more out of compatibility than just coming across someone and falling in love." Shifting gender roles and expectations also are involved, said Stephanie Coontz, who teaches history and family studies at The Evergreen State College in Olympia. Marriages in the 1950s and '60s were typically based on "pre-assigned" roles of the husband as provider and the wife as mother, she said. "In the last 20 years, people are marrying now as peers with more options outside marriage," Coontz said. "It's more necessary than it used to be to have a very deep friendship and to have good negotiating skills." The "big irony," she said, is that "the very fact that people have options outside marriage in many ways makes them think more carefully about commitment before they do get married." And then there's the aging of baby boomers. "As you're getting older, the less likelier you are of getting divorced," Schwartz said. "You're less likely to run off in your 60s than in your 40s." Information from: Seattle Post-Intelligencer, 2003 The Joplin Globe Publishing Company. Terms of use for this service. Read our privacy guidelines.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_HOME_ALONE_WAOL-?SITE=MOJOP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT The Joplin Globe - Online Edition The Joplin Globe • 117 E. Fourth St. • Joplin, MO 64801 • (417) 623-3480 • (800) 444-8514 • Fax [417] 623-8450 9 Days in Haiti Advertise with The Globe May 11, 6:05 AM EDT Three preschool children found home alone in Spokane SPOKANE, Wash. (AP) -- A preschooler called 911 and said, "mom and daddy go bye bye," helping to lead authorities to the discovery of three young children alone in a trash-strewn house with drug paraphernalia. Jennifer K. Rigutto, 34, the mother of two of the children, was arrested when she showed up Thursday after a gambling trip, police Officer William Hager said. She was held for investigation of three counts of child endangerment and one of possession of methamphetamine with intent to deliver, Hager said. The children were taken into custody by state Child Protective Services workers after being alone for as long as four hours. The case arose after child protection workers called the house for a welfare check about 8:45 a.m. Thursday and one of the children answered the phone, Police Lt. Darrell Toombs said. As CPS workers headed to the home, one of the children called 911 and said, "mom and daddy go bye-bye," Hager said. Officers dispatched to the scene were retrieving baby clothes from the master bedroom when they found methamphetamine and requested a search warrant, police said. Rigutto told authorities she left the two boys and a girl, ages 4, 3 and 2, with her ex-husband, William "Shad" Smith, 35, about 5 a.m. to go gambling with her boyfriend. "I would never, never leave my children alone," Rigutto said. Smith was arrested Thursday evening as he was boarding a transit bus and was jailed for investigation of three counts of second-degree child abandonment, Hager said. Police were seeking Rigutto's boyfriend, Michael S. Perry, 30, who also lives at the home and recently was granted custody of his 3-year-old son, who was one of the children in the house, Hager said. The house reeked of unwashed laundry, and the floors apparently had not been swept in weeks with trash thick enough to hinder walking from room to room, Toombs said. Detective John Willard, who specializes in cases involving drug-endangered children, said he had seen worse. "I've been in houses where you come out every five to 10 minutes so you can breathe," Willard said. "It was filthy, not terrible." Information from: The Spokesman-Review, 2003 The Joplin Globe Publishing Company. Terms of use for this service. Read our privacy guidelines.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_BRF_GATES_FOUNDATION_KATRINA_WAOL-?SITE=MOJOP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT The Joplin Globe - Online Edition The Joplin Globe • 117 E. Fourth St. • Joplin, MO 64801 • (417) 623-3480 • (800) 444-8514 • Fax [417] 623-8450 9 Days in Haiti Advertise with The Globe May 10, 11:58 PM EDT Gates Foundation gives $7.1M to support Gulf Coast housing SEATTLE (AP) -- The Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation said Thursday it would give $7.1 million to help Gulf Coast organizations advocate for affordable housing and workers' rights. The money, which will be distributed by Oxfam America, is intended to help the people whose homes were destroyed by hurricanes Katrina and Rita and those who have been employed to work on the cleanup. "During the past year and a half, we have seen how many of the Gulf Coast's neediest residents have been denied the resources they need to rebuild their lives - and how the low-wage workers who are making the rebuilding effort possible have been exploited," Raymond C. Offenheiser, president of Oxfam America, said in a statement. He said Oxfam works with local community leaders who are advocating for change in Louisiana and Mississippi. "Inequities that existed before the devastating hurricanes of 2005 have become even more pronounced and new ones have arisen," said Hilary Pennington, director of special initiatives for the Gates Foundation. "This investment, although outside the scope of our usual giving, reflects the enormity of the crisis and our desire to support local organizations so they can grow in expertise and influence." Since 2005, the Gates Foundation has also given money to help displaced students, and refurbish and rebuild libraries on the Gulf Coast. The foundation gives a majority of its grants in the areas of world health, global development and education. 2003 The Joplin Globe Publishing Company. Terms of use for this service. Read our privacy guidelines.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/S/SEATTLE_U_WAOL-?SITE=WVEC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT May 11, 7:06 PM EDT Seattle U trustees vote to seek return to Division I athletics SEATTLE (AP) -- Intent on recapturing some of its storied history, Seattle University is returning to Division I athletics. University trustees voted unanimously Thursday to apply for a return to NCAA Division I athletics as an independent. The process would begin immediately, with the 2007-08 year being the school's exploratory year, and a full Division I schedule beginning by the start of the 2009-10 year at the latest. Making the move without the security of a conference affiliation adds significant obstacles. But university officials are confident they've made the right decision. "This decision represents that intercollegiate athletics be on par with the rest of university in size, location, academic quality, student life and mission," Seattle U president, the Rev. Stephen Sundborg, said Friday. "Athletics should be on par and equal to and the same in student life and reputation as the rest of the university, and we have not been there." Seattle U's decision comes despite its preferred new home in Division I - the West Coast Conference - telling the school two months ago it does not intend to expand. It seemed a debilitating blow to Seattle U, which never hid its affection for returning to the conference it belonged to in the 1970s. Men's basketball coach Joe Callero called it a "mixed bag of emotions," when the WCC made its announcement. The Redhawks were in the midst of a conference championship and trip to the NCAA Division II tournament when the school received word. But Sundborg said the school refocused and determined that competing as an independent was possible. "We would like to aim toward being member of conference of like schools, but for an interim period of time after the exploratory year, we'll be independent," Sundborg said. Seattle U, a member of the WCC from 1971 until 1980, was once a Division I power in men's basketball, with a heritage that listed a number of NBA players, including Hall of Famer Elgin Baylor. Financial strain and athletic struggles led the school to drop out of Division I after the 1980 school year. The university now competes at the Division II level in the Great Northwest Athletic Conference, and will do so for the 2007-08 school year. Seattle U meets NCAA Division I minimums with the 14 sports it offers, but intends to add baseball, and men's and women's tennis and golf when the move is made, athletic director Bill Hogan said. WCC president Michael Gilleran, a Seattle U alum, said Friday that the conference has not closed off the idea of expansion, but it won't happen in the immediate future. "Right now our presidents are happy with who we are. We're just going to stay the course," Gilleran said. "I never say never. It would be silly. We'll revisit at some point in time." Seattle U is beginning a $47.5 million renovation to its campus athletic and recreation center. Initially, plans are to play men's basketball games at Seattle's KeyArena. "Our situation is unique as far as location and size," Hogan said. "We think we can be a special competition as an independent for a lot of schools." One reason for the renewed interest is the basketball success of Gonzaga University in Spokane, the other Jesuit-run college in Washington state and a member of the WCC. Gonzaga has made nine straight trips to the NCAA tournament. All the national exposure has dramatically raised applications and enrollment, and the school was able to build a new 6,000-seat arena that is perpetually sold out. But Seattle U's move isn't without dissension. A survey of university faculty found that more than half were against making the jump, concerned about the effect on academic programs and standards. "It's been an interesting year for the variety of opinions to come forward," Sundborg said. "There is a lot we need to work out in the course of it."
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_FORT_LEWIS_DEAD_WAOL-?SITE=WVEC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT May 11, 7:07 PM EDT Fort Lewis prepares to honor six fallen soldiers FORT LEWIS, Wash. (AP) -- Maj. Bob Bennett struggles with what he will say next week at the memorial for six Fort Lewis soldiers killed in Iraq. He's delivered remarks at such ceremonies since the 3rd Brigade, 2nd Infantry division lost its first soldier in August. But it never gets easier. "I don't know what I'm going to say," said Bennett, the brigade's rear detachment commander in charge of arranging memorial services of fallen soldiers. This time it's for six killed Sunday in a Stryker bombing in Baqubah. The roadside bomb exploded beneath the vehicle, killing Staff Sgt. Vincenzo Romeo, 23; Sgt. Jason Harkins, 25; Sgt. Joel Lewis, 28; Cpl. Matthew Alexander, 21; Cpl. Anthony Bradshaw, 21; and Cpl. Michael Pursel, 19. Also killed was Russian photojournalist, Dmitry Chebotayev, 29. The attack took the most since the Mosul dining hall bombing in December 2004, and was the first to claim so many from a single unit. "It's akin to an entire family being wiped out on I-5, it's that tight. And it affects that entire company in Iraq," Bennett said. Tuesday's memorial at Fort Lewis will be held at the gym at Soldiers Field House to accommodate a large turnout. The driver of the Stryker was the sole survivor, and suffered wounds to one of his hands, Bennett said. He was evacuated to Landstuhl Regional Medical Center in Germany and will likely be flown home to a stateside hospital over the next week. News that a soldier has been killed usually arrives in the early morning. The caller gives a name, a Social Security number and preliminary details, so beginning a process that will involve many of the roughly 250 soldiers under Bennett's charge. "Everything stops," Bennett said Thursday. "It becomes the total focus of what we're doing, and it ought to be the total focus of what we're doing." In Iraq, the brigade's commander, Col. Steve Townsend, immediately went from Baghdad to Baqouba to help soldiers deal with their loss. They also had to prepare to return to the difficult combat they've seen since arriving in the insurgent stronghold of Baqouba in mid-March. At Fort Lewis, six soldiers work closely with each fallen service member's family. Another six escort home the remains of their comrades, which will arrive at Dover Air Force Base in Delaware. The fallen soldier's ribbons and decorations must be properly displayed on their dress green uniforms before being delivered to the family and then the burial place, Bennett said. An honor guard greets each soldier's arrival at his hometown. To help guide the process, the unit refers to an inch-thick "What If" book of forms that soldiers fill out before deployment. Information from: The News Tribune,
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BLUE_ANGELS_CRASH_WAOL-?SITE=WVEC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT May 11, 3:41 PM EDT Blue Angels regroup for N.C. show, first since fatal crash SEYMOUR JOHNSON AIR FORCE BASE, N.C. (AP) -- After 21 years as a U.S. Navy pilot, his career boasting nearly 900 aircraft carrier landings and air combat during the first Gulf War, tragedy comes as no surprise to Cmdr. Kevin Mannix. That includes last month's fatal crash of a fellow Blue Angels pilot during a show in South Carolina. But for Blue Angels pilots, whose demeanor is a key part of the job, the tragedy offers another opportunity to perform the mission they were first given six decades ago: promote the U.S. Navy and U.S. Marines Corps to the world. "Our ability to bounce back and do our mission is the same as every other squadron in the U.S. Navy or U.S. Marine Corps," said Mannix, minutes after practicing Thursday at Seymour Johnson Air Force Base in Goldsboro, where the team on Saturday will perform its first show since the crash April 21. "The only difference is there's a lot more visibility on us because we are in the public eye. That's our job and that's what we do. I think a lot more media was focused our way on this specific mishap." Lt. Cmdr. Kevin Davis, 32, died when his No. 6 jet went down during the final minutes of a performance at the Marine Corps Air Station Beaufort in Beaufort, S.C. The Pittsfield, Mass., native was in his first year flying in formation with the team. An investigation into the cause of the crash, the Blue Angels' first since 1999 and the 26th fatality in the team's 60-year history, could take several months, according to the Navy. The Blue Angels typically fly their F/A-18A Hornets six days a week, but they stayed on the ground for nine days after the crash, canceling performances May 5 and May 6 at Offutt Air Force Base in Nebraska. Saturday's show will feature only five jets. Lt. Cmdr. Craig Olson, 37, of Kirkland, Wash., replaced Davis a couple of weeks ago. Olson, who flew with the Blue Angels from 2003-2005, will practice with the team for a few more weeks before flying in a show, Mannix said. Mannix said there was a lot of anxiety among the pilots before they flew for the first time after the crash. "We lost a brother, a great friend, a great American, actually," Lt. Cmdr. John Allison, who flies the No. 5 jet, told reporters Thursday after practice. "But we're trying to move forward and think about flying, you know, think about our jobs." During Thursday's practice, the team flew in its traditional delta formation, the triangle lineup they were in when Davis crashed. Olson practiced as one of two solo members, hitting mach speeds and performing head-on near misses with Allison. Each year, the Navy considers up to about 70 pilots for the squadron. The final six pilots train constantly between January and March at El Centro Naval Air Facility, Calif., and are stationed at Pensacola Naval Air Station in Florida. The team is scheduled to fly 66 air shows this year at 35 locations across the country, including Seattle. The Blue Angels fly without the traditional G-suits, which most jet pilots wear to avoid blacking out during maneuvers that exert strong gravitational forces. The suits inflate and deflate air bladders around the lower body to keep blood in the brain and heart. The air bladders can cause a pilot to bump the control stick, so the Blue Angels learn to manage the G-forces by tensing their abdominal muscles. After a fatal crash, one of the best responses is to get back into the cockpit, team members said, and grace the skies with twirls, climbs, dives and near misses at around 350 mph and only inches apart. "It feels good for the team to go back and do it," Mannix said Thursday, "including myself all the way down to the maintainers to do what we do for the American public, to get out there and show them we are resilient in what we do." Wings Over Wayne Air Show:
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_PORTS_RADIATION_TESTING_WAOL-?SITE=WVEC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT May 11, 1:11 PM EDT Tacoma port selected for radiation testing program TACOMA, Wash. (AP) -- New technology that could lead to better checks for nuclear materials being smuggled through the country's ports will be tested at the Port of Tacoma. The Department of Homeland Security plans to screen cargo on trains before they leave the port. More than 70 percent of the port's import containers move from shipping terminals to mainline railways, with some containers being checked manually. The railways then take the cargo to major markets in the Midwest and the East Coast. By comparison, between 60 percent and 70 percent of the Seattle port's cargo leaves by rail, but much of it is loaded onto a truck first. The goal of the program officially announced Friday is to improve security at ports without slowing the movement of cargo, said Mike Milne, spokesman for the department's U.S. Customs and Border Protection agency. "Out goal is to screen 100 percent of all cargo that comes in, whether it leaves by train or truck," Milne said. Ports in Seattle and Tacoma, like others around the country, already test outgoing trucks carrying containers using radiation monitors. Trains don't pass through those checkpoints, though. On trains, containers are also stacked densely, making it more difficult to unpack the train when a radiation signal is detected, Milne said. "The challenge will be to devise radiation screening that will work in the various loading and unloading processes," he said. Information from: The Seattle Times,
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_WASHINGTON_MARRIAGE_WAOL-?SITE=WVEC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT May 11, 8:50 AM EDT Marriage and divorce rates at two-decade low in Washington state SEATTLE (AP) -- Marriage and divorce rates are at a two-decade low in Washington state, and experts are divided on the reason. The state recorded fewer divorces in 2004 than in 1986 despite a 1.7 million population increase, and that's in line with a national trend. The nation's divorce rate, which shot upward following the widespread adoption of state no-fault divorce laws starting in the 1960s to a peak of 5.3 divorces per 1,000 people in 1981, has since fallen to 3.6. In Washington the decline from 1986 to 2004 was from 5.9 to 4.2. "If you have fewer marriages, you are going to have fewer divorces.," said Pepper Schwartz, a University of Washington sociologist. More couples now live together without getting married, and "you can't get divorced unless you are married," Schwartz said. Others note that many couples wait longer to get married, so they have more time to mature and get to know each other. The result, some say, is more durable marriages. Other marriage experts cite a "divorce divide," saying divorce rates are falling substantively among college-educated couples but not among less affluent and less educated couples. "Families with two earners with good jobs have seen an improvement in their standard of living, which leads to less tension at home and lower probability of divorce," said Andrew Cherlin, a professor of public policy at Johns Hopkins University. "People are getting married later now than they ever have, and cohabitation is on the rise," said Les Parrott, co-founder of the Center for Relationship Development at Seattle Pacific University. "So many (young couples) are feeling unprepared for it. They've seen plenty of examples of how marriage doesn't work, so they put it off." With a long engagement, "the couple gets along better," said Heather Edy, owner of Wedding Bell Bliss Bridal Consultation in Seattle. "I truly believe they're more compatible for marriage." Edy, 28, is a fair example. In August she plans to marry Clint Sharpe, 30, whom she has dated for four years and to whom she got engaged on Valentine's Day last year. Nikelle Rosier, a marriage educator and couples therapist in Seattle, said her clients are displaying "more intentionality" in marriage decisions. "What's interesting is that a lot of clients met through Match.com," she said. "They're picking a mate more out of compatibility than just coming across someone and falling in love." Shifting gender roles and expectations also are involved, said Stephanie Coontz, who teaches history and family studies at The Evergreen State College in Olympia. Marriages in the 1950s and '60s were typically based on "pre-assigned" roles of the husband as provider and the wife as mother, she said. "In the last 20 years, people are marrying now as peers with more options outside marriage," Coontz said. "It's more necessary than it used to be to have a very deep friendship and to have good negotiating skills." The "big irony," she said, is that "the very fact that people have options outside marriage in many ways makes them think more carefully about commitment before they do get married." And then there's the aging of baby boomers. "As you're getting older, the less likelier you are of getting divorced," Schwartz said. "You're less likely to run off in your 60s than in your 40s." Information from: Seattle Post-Intelligencer,
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/ID_CALDER_SHOOTINGS_WAOL-?SITE=WVEC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT May 11, 8:10 AM EDT Three dead in apparent homicide-suicide in north Idaho CALDER, Idaho (AP) -- An elderly couple and a younger man were found dead and a woman survived a head wound after being shot at a remote house outside this north Idaho hamlet, Shoshone County sheriff's deputies said. Deputies gave few details early Friday, but neighbors said a distraught man had wounded his estranged wife, killed her parents and committed suicide Thursday evening in a small wooden house a few hundred yards from the nearest dwellings. Sheriff's Sgt. Derek Dofelmire told The Associated Press the survivor was Rose Turner and one of the dead was Ricky Turner. He would not identify the elderly man and woman. Rose Turner was "very lucky" to be alive and was flown to Sacred Heart Medical Center in Spokane, Wash., where "she has been able to provide information to our investigators," Dofelmire said. More than one gun was recovered at the scene, he added. Shoshone and Benewah deputies closed a road off U.S. Forest Service Road 50, the St. Joe River Road, in the Idaho Panhandle about two miles east of Calder and 65 miles east-southeast of Spokane. Neighbors told The Spokesman-Review of Spokane and KXLY and KREM Television that Ricky Turner is Rose Turner's estranged husband and committed suicide after shooting her and her parents. The Turners had three children, Ricky Turner was disabled, Rose Turner worked at a nursing home and her parents lived with her at the house, one neighbor, Julie "Tiny" Codoni, told the newspaper. She said Ricky Turner was despondent over their divorce, which was scheduled to take effect Thursday. When she talked to him Wednesday, "he was in really bad shape. He was hurting," Codoni said. "He loved her. She was his life."
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_AMERICAN_IDOL_BLAKE_LEWIS_WAOL-?SITE=WVEC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT May 11, 6:24 PM EDT Sir Mix-A-Lot helps celebrate 'Idol' finalist Blake Lewis SEATTLE (AP) -- Baby got back, and Seattle got Blake. "American Idol" finalist Blake Lewis returned to Seattle on Friday, playing a free concert before more than a thousand fans at Westlake Park, where he was joined onstage by Seattle's own Sir Mix-A-Lot. Mix-A-Lot sang his hit "Baby Got Back" over what many in the crowd came to see: Blake's beat-boxing. "Every time you watch 'American Idol,' you see people that can sing, and that's it," Mix-A-Lot said to wild applause. "This cat got real talent. ... He's the new king of Sea-town, baby." Lewis, 25, is one of three remaining contestants on Fox's wildly popular singing contest, and his homecoming plans included a parade in his suburban hometown of Bothell and the national anthem at the Mariners-Yankees game Friday night. He looked out on the crowd in the warm midday sunshine and said: "I'm speechless. Thank you guys for all the support." But Lewis directed most of his onstage banter at urging his fans to support local music, giving repeated shout-outs to rising Seattle hip-hop stars Blue Scholars and Common Market. "A lot's changed since I saw you last," Common Market's RA Scion said to him before unleashing a torrent of lyrics over Lewis' beat-boxing. Many in the crowd, populated largely by truant teenage girls, screamed and waved signs that read "Blaker Girls" or "We (heart) Blake." Blaire Ginnever, a 14-year-old eighth-grader, said she was skipping her lunch period and Spanish class at Villa Academy in Seattle. "Blake es muy bueno," she said. Her favorite part? "The beat-boxing - it's just, like, unique and nobody else can do it on the show." Ginnever's mom, Marilyn, was also in the crowd, and said she didn't mind that her daughter was missing school. "It's the end of the year, and this is big for Seattle," she said. "We follow the show. It's kind of a family event, and rooting for a hometown boy makes it special." City Councilwoman Jean Godden, who is old enough to remember a significant chunk of Seattle's musical history, read a proclamation declaring Friday "Blake Lewis Day" and placing the "reknowned beat-box musician" in a local tradition that includes Jimi Hendrix, Quincy Jones, Ann and Nancy Wilson, Nirvana, Modest Mouse and Death Cab for Cutie. Lauren Barberena, 26, said she had never watched "American Idol," but she bounced with the music and held her cell phone high in the air as Lewis, backed by local trio Ari Sawkadoria, sang Keane's "Somewhere Only We Know." "My friend's 11-year-old daughter asked me to call her," she said. "If it's good music, it's good music."
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_SOLDIERS_KILLED_WAOL-?SITE=WVEC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT May 11, 6:54 PM EDT Fort Lewis soldier from Idaho killed in Iraq FORT LEWIS, Wash. (AP) -- A soldier from Idaho is the latest Fort Lewis service member to die in Iraq, the Department of Defense said Friday. The department also identified a second Idaho soldier killed in an attack earlier this week. Sgt. Maj. Bradly D. Conner, 41, of Coeur d'Alene, Idaho, died Wednesday near Al-Hillah, about 60 miles south of Baghdad. He was killed when a homemade bomb detonated near his vehicle, the department said in a news release Friday afternoon. Conner was assigned to the 2nd Battalion, 1st Special Forces Group at Fort Lewis. A Fort Lewis spokeswoman on Friday directed inquiries on Conner to U.S. Army Special Operations Command at Fort Bragg, N.C. Public affairs officials there did not immediately return a message by is the 106th soldier from the post south of Tacoma to die in Iraq. On Sunday, six members of the 3rd Brigade, 2nd Infantry Division were killed along with a Russian freelance photojournalist when a bomb exploded beneath their Stryker vehicle in Baqubah, northwest of Baghdad. Sgt. Blake C. Stephens, 25, of Pocatello, Idaho, was also identified by the Defense Department on Friday as one of two soldiers who died Tuesday in Salman Pak, about 18 miles south of Baghdad, when a roadside bomb exploded near their vehicle. Stephens and Spc. Kyle A. Little, 20, of West Boylston, Mass., were assigned to Headquarters and Headquarters Company, 3rd Brigade Combat Team, 3rd Infantry Division at Fort Benning, Ga. Conner and Stephens are the 26th and 27th Idaho soldiers killed in Iraq since the war began in March 2003.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/P/PACCAR_COLUMBUS_WAOL-?SITE=WVEC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT May 11, 7:09 PM EDT PACCAR to build multimillion plant in Mississippi JACKSON, Miss. (AP) -- PACCAR Inc. plans to build a $400 million engine manufacturing plant in Columbus. PACCAR, a publicly traded Fortune 200 company, was the name floating around when lawmakers met in special session last month to pass an incentive package aimed at bringing jobs to north Mississippi, but no one was willing to publicly confirm the speculation. Gov. Haley Barbour held a news conference Friday in Columbus to make it official. PACCAR, of Bellevue, Wash., is the maker of Peterbilt and Kenworth trucks. Production at the new plant could start by 2010 and officials say it will employ hundreds of people with an estimated payroll of $18 million. "The creation of 500 new jobs and the public and private investment in Lowndes County will contribute significantly to continued economic growth here in Northeast Mississippi," Barbour said in a news release. "I am pleased with the decision of this major international company to locate here, which is further testament to the tremendously skilled work force and can-do attitude at every level in this region." Construction on the 400,000-square-foot plant is scheduled to begin this year. The facility will produce 12.9-liter and 9.2-liter diesel engines for Kenworth, Peterbilt and DAF, a news release on PACCAR's Web site said. "PACCAR is pleased to locate its engine facility in one of the most dynamic and progressive areas in the Southeast," Mark Pigott, chairman and chief executive officer, said in the new release. The Columbus site "provides superb proximity to our dealers, customers and strategic supplier partners." Barbour signed into law three incentive bills related to the project that lawmakers approved during a special session April 27. The incentive package totals $48.4 million for the Lowndes County project. The incentives package is for funding onsite improvements on roads, site preparation and the extension of water and wastewater services, as well as offsite items like infrastructure and work-force training. The bills allow Lowndes County to issue $15 million in bonds and use eminent domain to obtain property for the plant. "We appreciate the outstanding support from the State of Mississippi and Lowndes County in partnering with PACCAR to bring this significant economic investment to the area," Richard Bangert, PACCAR's vice president, said in a news release. "We look forward to developing a close relationship with Mississippi State University and regional community colleges by investing in their advanced engineering programs, as well as providing ongoing educational opportunities for our employees."
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/B/BORDER_PASSPORTS_WAOL-?SITE=WVEC&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT May 11, 3:53 PM EDT Homeland Security: Border passport rule begins in January WASHINGTON (AP) -- The new rule that anyone driving across the Canadian border must have a passport or passcard will "absolutely" begin in January, government officials said Friday, refuting a New York senator's claim the plan will be delayed. Lawmakers from states along the northern border have been trying for months to stall or alter the plan to require the more secure identification documents, contending the rule will hurt trade and tourism. The Western Hemisphere Travel Initiative was created by Congress to tighten security on both the Canadian and Mexican borders, but many members are now fuming at the notion their constituents will need a $97 dollar passport or a not-yet-developed passcard, expected to cost around $50. Children would be exempt. Democratic Sen. Charles Schumer predicted Thursday the government won't be able to start in January, but Department of Homeland Security officials insist they will. "We have a firm deadline and we're absolutely committed to moving forward with the implementation of western hemisphere travel requirements at our northern border," said DHS spokesman Russ Knocke. The agency does not have a date for people to start applying for the new passcards, which are being created by the State Department, but Knocke said that would not affect the January launch. Lawmakers have repeatedly passed legislation trying to delay the land-crossing requirements. On Wednesday, the House passed a measure designed to push back the starting date until 2009 or beyond. But the administration is going ahead and Knocke rapped Schumer for fighting the security measure, launched after a recommendation from the 9/11 commission to make it harder for potential terrorists to use bogus documents to enter the United States. "You can either be for security or against security," Knocke said, adding that some states have already begun discussions about creating new driver's licenses that would be so secure they could be used instead of passports. Knocke said the agency has talked with state officials in Washington, Michigan, and Vermont about a driver's license program - though he added that should not be taken as a signal DHS is going to loosen its border requirements. On Thursday, Schumer said DHS "drives me crazy" because of what he called their incompetence, particularly over the border passports issue. The New York senator said the agency formed after the Sept. 11 terror attacks should be broken up because it is too large to function well. The DHS spokesman called those comments an affront to the agency's 208,000 employees. "It is discouraging for them to hear senior officials or members of Congress constantly armchair quarterback what they do and suggest that the solution to our challenges is yet another reorganization," said Knocke. "The deck chairs have been reorganized enough." Rather than criticize the agency, Schumer and other lawmakers should be encouraging people in their states to get passports, he said. Schumer responded Friday that "the problem with the current DHS management is the with us or against us mentality. They should understand that careful planning and smart management can help us achieve both security and commerce." Americans also will be required to carry a passport when they enter the U.S. from Mexico. Currently, they can generally cross with a drivers license and, in the case of children, a birth certificate. Mexican citizens are required to have a biometric, machine-readable visa, known as a laser visa, that allows them to be in the country up to 90 days.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_ZEBRA_MUSSELS_WAOL-?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 9:05 PM EDT Invasive zebra mussels reaching NW via boats By DONNA GORDON BLANKINSHIP SEATTLE (AP) -- This week's discovery of zebra mussels on a recreational boat traveling through Washington is the most recent sign that Pacific Northwest waters may be in danger of infestation by this tiny, but mighty invasive species, a state official said Friday. Inspectors at truck weigh stations have discovered zebra mussels on four boats in Washington since December, but since few recreational vessels are stopped at weigh stations, most are not inspected by the Washington State Patrol. "I feel like we've only caught the tip of the iceberg," said Pam Meacham, assistant aquatic invasive species coordinator for the Washington Department of Fish and Wildlife. Zebra mussels reproduce quickly and can clog pipes in municipal water systems and ruin boat motors. They were inadvertently introduced into waters near the Great Lakes in the mid-1980s and government officials have worked with sport fishing groups to keep the invaders from spreading. An invasion of zebra mussels also can impact a lake ecosystem as the creatures attach themselves to clams and other water life and eat all the food out of the water. "Fisheries in the Great Lakes have collapsed," Meacham said, adding that the infestation has spread west in recent years and is now a problem in California and Nevada. No zebra mussels have been found in Washington waters. The boat stopped Monday at the weigh station on Interstate 5 northbound near Ridgefield was targeted by biologists from Oregon Fish and Wildlife who noticed the boat and called Washington officials to have it inspected, Meacham said. The boat, which had been salvaged after sinking in an infested lake in the Midwest, was on its way to Vancouver Island, British Columbia. Another boat was stopped in Cle Elum on the same day and sent to a boat yard to have its zebra mussels removed, she said. "Zebra mussels have been considered a threat to our waters for a long time," she said. In 1998, the state Legislature formed a task force to address this aquatic threat as well as problems with green crabs. Meacham and her boss are the state coordinators for the Aquatic Nuisance Species Task Force. Since 2000, the Washington State Patrol has been asked to inspect boats that pass through truck weigh stations as they are being commercially hauled. "It's a very real threat. They can get here easily," Meacham said, adding that the program has discovered mussels on a number of boats and the owners were told to take action to prevent the mussels from getting in state waters. Meacham said Friday she was surprised at the response to this week's zebra mussel discovery, since she and others have been working to educate the public about this problem for many years. Large recreational lakes that are visited by people who travel around with their boats are most in danger of infestation, Meacham said. Officials from the Department of Fish and Wildlife plan to be at every fishing tournament in Washington this year to educate boaters about the problem. Meacham said boaters need to learn where to look on and in their boats for the tiny mollusks and how to clean their vessels to remove any zebra mussels or other invasive species so they won't be responsible for spreading a problem.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_SOLDIERS_KILLED_WAOL-?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 11:56 PM EDT Three more Fort Lewis soldiers killed in Iraq FORT LEWIS, Wash. (AP) -- Soldiers from Idaho, New Jersey and Mississippi are the latest Fort Lewis service members to die in Iraq, relatives and the Department of Defense said Friday. The department also identified a second Idaho soldier killed in an attack earlier this week. A 22-year-old soldier who spent most of his life in Atlantic County, N.J., before enlisting in the Army last year was killed in Iraq on Thursday, just two months after being sent overseas. Pvt. Anthony J. Sausto, who was born in Somers Point and later moved to Hamilton Township, was killed by small arms fire in Baghdad, family members told The Press of Atlantic City on Friday. Sausto was a member of the 1st Battalion, 38th Infantry Regiment, 4th Brigade Combat Team, 2nd Infantry Division at Fort Lewis. Relatives said Sausto was a shy, quiet youth who "came out of his shell" when he joined the Army. "He used to be so shy, and now he was so outgoing and confident," said his sister-in-law, Mary Sausto. "It was like, out of nowhere, he decided to be a man." Army Sgt. Jason W. Vaughn, 29, of Iuka, Miss., died Thursday in Baqouba when an explosive detonated near his vehicle. He was assigned to the 5th Battalion, 20th Infantry Regiment, 3rd Brigade, 2nd Infantry Division at Fort Lewis, the Defense Department said Friday in a news release. Sgt. Maj. Bradly D. Conner, 41, of Coeur d'Alene, Idaho, died Wednesday near Al-Hillah, about 60 miles south of Baghdad. He was killed when a homemade bomb detonated near his vehicle. Conner was assigned to the 2nd Battalion, 1st Special Forces Group at Fort Lewis. A Fort Lewis spokeswoman on Friday directed inquiries on Conner to U.S. Army Special Operations Command at Fort Bragg, N.C. Public affairs officials there did not immediately return a message by Sunday, six members of the base's 3rd Brigade, 2nd Infantry Division were killed along with a Russian freelance photojournalist when a bomb exploded beneath their Stryker vehicle in Baqubah, northwest of Baghdad. Sgt. Blake C. Stephens, 25, of Pocatello, Idaho, was also identified by the Defense Department on Friday as one of two soldiers who died Tuesday in Salman Pak, about 18 miles south of Baghdad, when a roadside bomb exploded near their vehicle. Stephens and Spc. Kyle A. Little, 20, of West Boylston, Mass., were assigned to Headquarters and Headquarters Company, 3rd Brigade Combat Team, 3rd Infantry Division at Fort Benning, Ga. Conner and Stephens are the 26th and 27th Idaho soldiers killed in Iraq since the war began in March 2003.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_XGR_UNION_DUES_WAOL-?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 8:28 PM EDT WA politics: Gregoire OKs union dues measure OLYMPIA, Wash. (AP) -- Gov. Chris Gregoire on Friday signed legislation allowing labor unions to spend nonmembers' bargaining fees on political causes without first getting their permission. The new law cleared the Legislature almost exclusively with Democratic votes last month, with critics calling it a clear labor-backed attempt to circumvent a pending ruling by the U.S. Supreme Court in a case involving the Washington Education Association. Gregoire, when she was still attorney general, initiated the case that is moving through the high court. Rep. Joe McDermott, D-Seattle, and other sponsors insisted the bill wasn't related to the litigation and simply clarifies accounting rules. State law regulates how unions can spend fees paid by workers who don't join the bargaining group. The nonmembers can be charged "agency fees" by the union to help finance bargaining that affects them, but they can't be forced to pay for the union's political activities. Nonmembers represented by the WEA can ask for a partial refund of part of their fees. The bill signed by the governor deals with commingling of funds. It says that when labor organizations make political campaign contributions, they aren't considered to be using agency shop fees when the union treasury has enough money to cover the contributions from other revenue sources. "This change in law provides clarity and should prevent future questions over interpretations of the proper use of agency shop fees," Gregoire said. She said it's a simple and well-accepted accounting principle and "in no way changes the prohibition against agency shop fees being spent for political purposes without affirmative authorization from individual agency fee payers." Debra Carnes of the WEA hailed the new law. "We think it's a good piece of legislation because it provides clarification that we haven't been able to get before now," she said. "We believe that now our members can move forward together to collectively speak out on issues that affect the profession." Sen. Jeanne Kohl-Welles, D-Seattle, said during Senate debate that nonunion members have always had, and will still maintain, the right to object and get a rebate. But opponents said that unless a nonmember specifically asks for a refund, that person won't know whether his fees are being used for political purposes he doesn't support. Initiative 134, a campaign-finance measure approved by voters in 1992, required unions to secure permission from each nonmember before spending any portion of the fees on politics. But that provision was overturned by the state Supreme Court. Some teachers and the state appealed to the U.S. Supreme Court. During a memo to the Legislature this year, the attorney general's office said the bill could expose the state to further litigation by adopting a "constitutionally forbidden" accounting procedure. The case stemmed from a complaint filed by the Evergreen Freedom Foundation, an Olympia-based conservative think tank. The foundation and the WEA have sparred for years about nonmember fees. The group complained about the new law and about Gregoire's decision to leave in place an emergency clause that made it take effect immediately, rather than allow a possible referendum campaign in the next 90 days. "Today, Gov. Gregoire has signed a bill that ignores the First Amendment rights of workers in order to expand union power," said EFF labor policy director Mike Reitz. "The bill is premature, because the U.S. Supreme Court could rule on the constitutionality of the law at any time. "Signing this bill virtually guarantees continued litigation." The governor also signed measures dealing with: -NIGHTCLUB SPRINKLERS. The new law requires nightclubs to install automatic sprinkler systems by Dec. 1, 2009. -FARM FUEL. Biodiesel fuel, including diesel blend, is exempted from sales tax when used by farmers off the highway. -LEMON LAW. The state's "lemon law" protecting consumers who buy or lease vehicles is extended to out-of-state customers who buy or lease here and register them elsewhere. The union fees measure is House Bill 2079. The sprinkler bill is HB1811. The tax bill is SB5009. The lemon law bill is HB2135.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_AMERICAN_IDOL_BLAKE_LEWIS_WAOL-?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 7:57 PM EDT Sir Mix-A-Lot helps celebrate 'Idol' finalist Blake Lewis SEATTLE (AP) -- Baby got back, and Seattle got Blake. "American Idol" finalist Blake Lewis returned to Seattle on Friday, playing a free concert before more than a thousand fans at Westlake Park, where he was joined onstage by Seattle's own Sir Mix-A-Lot. Mix-A-Lot sang his hit "Baby Got Back" over what many in the crowd came to see: Blake's beat-boxing. "Every time you watch 'American Idol,' you see people that can sing, and that's it," Mix-A-Lot said to wild applause. "This cat got real talent. ... He's the new king of Sea-town, baby." Lewis, 25, is one of three remaining contestants on Fox's wildly popular singing contest, and his homecoming included a parade in his suburban hometown of Bothell and the national anthem at the Mariners-Yankees game Friday night. He looked out on the crowd in the warm midday sunshine and said: "I'm speechless. Thank you guys for all the support." But Lewis directed most of his onstage banter at urging his fans to support local music, giving repeated shout-outs to rising Seattle hip-hop stars Blue Scholars and Common Market. "A lot's changed since I saw you last," Common Market's RA Scion said to him before unleashing a torrent of lyrics over Lewis' beat-boxing. Many in the crowd, populated largely by truant teenage girls, screamed and waved signs that read "Blaker Girls" or "We (heart) Blake." Blaire Ginnever, a 14-year-old eighth-grader, said she was skipping her lunch period and Spanish class at Villa Academy in Seattle. "Blake es muy bueno," she said. Her favorite part? "The beat-boxing - it's just, like, unique and nobody else can do it on the show." Ginnever's mom, Marilyn, was also in the crowd, and said she didn't mind that her daughter was missing school. "It's the end of the year, and this is big for Seattle," she said. "We follow the show. It's kind of a family event, and rooting for a hometown boy makes it special." City Councilwoman Jean Godden, who is old enough to remember a significant chunk of Seattle's musical history, read a proclamation declaring Friday "Blake Lewis Day" and placing the "renowned beat-box musician" in a local tradition that includes Jimi Hendrix, Quincy Jones, Ann and Nancy Wilson, Nirvana, Modest Mouse and Death Cab for Cutie. Lauren Barberena, 26, said she had never watched "American Idol," but she bounced with the music and held her cell phone high in the air as Lewis, backed by local trio Ari Sawkadoria, sang Keane's "Somewhere Only We Know." "My friend's 11-year-old daughter asked me to call her," she said. "If it's good music, it's good music."
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_CONSTRUCTION_ACCIDENT_WAOL-?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 8:14 PM EDT Flawed design blamed for deadly Bellevue, WA., crane collapse BELLEVUE, Wash. (AP) -- A flawed engineering design caused a Bellevue tower crane to collapse and kill one person in November, state officials said Friday. The foundation of the crane was designed to withstand only a quarter of the pressures exerted by the 210-foot-tall crane, an investigation by the Department of Labor and Industries found. The crane was fastened to steel I-beams instead of a more common poured concrete foundation. Operator error was not a factor: Investigators said the crane operator was well experienced and operating the crane properly. "The inadequate design of the tower-crane base clearly led to the collapse of the structure," Steve Cant, assistant director for the agency's Division of Occupational Health and Safety, said in a statement. "The problem was compounded by the failure of the general contractor to maintain and inspect the crane base in accordance with the manufacturer's specifications." Two companies are being cited for workplace safety violations: Magnusson Klemencic Associates, the engineering firm that designed the base, and general contractor Lease Crutcher Lewis. Labor and Industries proposed a fine of $5,600 for Magnusson Klemencic and a total of $8,900 in fines for Lease Crutcher Lewis. The companies have 15 business days to appeal the citations. "The Department of Labor & Industries made several factual errors in its investigation and L & I refused to discuss these facts despite MKA's repeated attempts to do so," said Jon Magnusson, Magnusson Klemencic chairman and CEO. He said his firm would appeal immediately. Bill Lewis, president of Lease Crutcher Lewis, said he wanted to study the L&I findings before commenting. On Nov. 16, the crane collapsed, killing a 31-year-old man and severely damaging three buildings. Matthew Ammon, a lawyer at Microsoft, died when the crane crushed the top floor of the Pinnacle Bell Centre, a 248-unit complex with stores on the ground floor and apartments above. The crane first hit Plaza 305, an office building, then struck the sixth and seventh floors of the Civica Office Commons before crashing onto the Pinnacle Bell Centre. Severe structural damage was reported to all three buildings. The collapse led to a reevaluation of all cranes in the Seattle area. Soon afterward, one crane in Bellevue was found to have significant cracks and was taken down, while a hairline crack in another was repaired. The Legislature this year approved several changes in the oversight of construction cranes, including a provision that plans for nonstandard tower crane bases must be reviewed and approved by an independent professional engineer.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/C/CANADA_TIGER_MAULING_WAOL-?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 12, 1:15 AM EDT Canadian woman fatally mauled by tiger at exotic animal farm 100 MILE HOUSE, British Columbia (AP) -- A 32-year-old woman was fatally mauled by a tiger in an attack witnessed by several children at an exotic animal farm in British Columbia, officials said Friday. Tanya Dumstrey-Soos was taken to a hospital in 100 Mile House after the attack late Thursday at Siberian Magic, about 25 miles to the east, but doctors couldn't save her, said regional coroner Bruce Chamberlayne. Scott Nelson, who employed Dumstrey-Soos as a receptionist and saleswoman at the 100 Mile House Advisor newspaper, said the farm was owned by Kim Carlton, the woman's fiance. Carlton "told me ... he didn't think the tiger had bit her. It's that she had a dress on and she was standing there and he was playing with the dress and grabbed her legs," Nelson said. "She was standing outside the cage and talking to Gangus, the cat swatted at the legs." Dumstrey-Soos was found outside the tiger's cage when emergency services arrived at the farm, said Royal Canadian Mounted Police Cpl. Scott Ksionzyk. "There is no indication that at any point the tiger was outside of the cage; nor is there any indication that the victim entered the cage," Ksionzyk said. A number of youngsters, including one of Dumstrey-Soos' children, witnessed the attack, said RCMP Constable Annie Linteau. Nelson said the woman spoke with her fiance by cell phone before she died. "Before she passed away Kim did say that he did have a chance to talk to Tanya," Nelson said. "He said the two were able to say they loved each other." Police said all the animals, including three tigers, a lion and a lemur, remained secured on the premises. British Columbia Agricultural Minister Barry Penner said authorities would determine whether there is a need to change regulations that allow private citizens to keep exotic animals. The Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals has called for legislation to ban the practice.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_FAKED_RETARDATION_WAOL-?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 11:42 PM EDT WA man who faked retardation for benefits sentenced to prison TACOMA, Wash. (AP) -- A Vancouver man was sentenced Friday to 13 months in prison for pretending to be mentally retarded in order to claim disability benefits. Pete J. Costello, 28, was sentenced here by U.S. District Judge Ronald Leighton. The man's mother, Rosie Costello, was scheduled to be sentenced next Thursday for coaching her son and daughter to feign mental retardation. The daughter has not been located by authorities. Pete Costello began receiving Social Security disability benefits when he was 8. He was ordered to repay the $59,226 he has received since turning 18. In February, Rosie Costello, 46, pleaded guilty to conspiracy to defraud the government as well as Social Security fraud. Pete Costello also pleaded guilty in February. The young man, who cannot read or write, dictated a letter to his public defender that was submitted to Leighton prior to sentencing and filed in court. "I know that it was wrong to 'act like a child' in the Social Security office when that is not how I really am," the letter said. "I feel very bad about this and want to do everything I can to pay this money back." According to the plea agreement, the woman began coaching her daughter at age 4, and later used the same ruse with her son. He continued to feign retardation into his mid-20s - picking at his face, slouching and appearing uncommunicative in meetings with Social Security officials. The scheme came to light last year after Pete Costello got a traffic ticket while driving in Vancouver, then was videotaped acting normally when he contested the ticket in court. His mother collected $287,715 during a 20-year period. In her plea agreement, she agreed to repay the government. Information from: The Columbian,
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_UTILITY_OVERTIME_WAOL-?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 10:53 PM EDT Three utility workers were highest-paid SEA employees in 2006 SEATTLE (AP) -- Seattle City Light workers made so much overtime in 2006 - because of the December windstorm, a shortage of skilled workers and a boom in construction projects - that three utility workers became the highest-paid city employees, government officials say. City Light paid $25.4 million in overtime last year, more than double the amount it paid in 2005. "We are concerned about it," Deputy Mayor Tim Ceis said. "It raises some issues for us about productivity and worker safety when you work that many hours. In some cases, it does seem excessive." Twenty-seven workers made at least $100,000 in overtime with 11 of them surpassing $200,000 in total income. City data indicates three line workers were the highest-paid employees in city ranks, earning even more than City Light Superintendent Jorge Carrasco's 2006 salary of $224,019. The highest-paid line worker earned $245,832 in regular pay and overtime, The Seattle Times reported. By comparison, city of Seattle figures show Mayor Greg Nickels earned $147,971 and Police Chief Gil Kerlikowske earned $181,240. Carrasco started an overtime audit after discussing the issue with Ceis. Dennis Sovern is a crew chief who averaged 80 to 90 hours a week last year and made $88,101 in regular pay, plus $136,324 in overtime - a total of $224,425. He said he works safely. "I'm really fortunate because I'm gifted in I don't get wore out," he told The Times. "I'm able to take a five- or 10-minute nap and I'm fine. But if I'm too tired to work, I don't work. I just don't go." Sovern, who has worked for the utility for 27 years, was the city's third highest-paid employee in 2006, according to city data. Chris Heimgartner, City Light's customer-service and energy-service delivery officer, said not all the overtime pay comes from working extra hours. The union contract says that if a break between a regular shift and an overtime shift is less than eight hours, the regular shift is also paid at double time. Line workers, who repair and install power lines, make some of the highest hourly wages in the city, about $33 an hour. Heimgartner estimated these workers averaged 65 to 70 hours a week in 2006. Overtime does not factor into pension payments. Heimgartner said the extra hours don't appear to affect safety. The injury rate has remained stable, but some city officials are worried about the long hours. The utility had budgeted $10 million for overtime in 2006, and ended up spending more than twice as much. The utility has 50 vacancies among its 180 line-worker positions. Enrollment in the apprentice program is close to capacity, but it takes four years to fully train apprentices for line-worker jobs. The city may bring in contractors to keep up with the workload. The windstorm that cut power to 175,000 City Light customers in December accounted for only about an eighth of the total overtime. Heimgartner estimates a line worker could have earned an extra $10,000 in the days after the storm. Information from: The Seattle Times,
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_WSU_SEX_HARASSMENT_WAOL-?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 9:20 PM EDT Professor facing sexual harassment trial resigns PULLMAN, Wash. (AP) -- A Washington State University professor sued by a student alleging sexual harassment has resigned as part of an agreement that will provide legal representation and pay any judgment in the lawsuit. Bernardo Gallegos, a professor of multicultural education since 2004, is accused of making advances toward a married graduate student in his home in February 2005. In exchange for his resignation, he will be paid more than $87,000 to buy out his tenure, though he will lose some benefits. His salary was more than $132,000 a year. The student, Christina Garcia, sued Gallegos and the university, saying her ability to get an education was damaged and that Gallegos wasn't adequately disciplined, although a university investigation concluded that he violated school policies. Gallegos has maintained his innocence. He did not immediately return a call for comment on Friday. The agreement between Gallegos and the WSU regents, approved May 4, said the university will defend and indemnify him in the Whitman County Superior Court lawsuit. The lawsuit alleges Gallegos committed sexual harassment when he took Garcia to his candlelit home in February 2005. Gallegos was not her direct supervisor or instructor, but was in a position to influence her education, a judge ruled. A trial is scheduled for September. Guy Nelson, who represents Garcia, said he was happy with the agreement. "We believe the board of regents took a very positive step," he said. The regents also have adopted a new policy on sexual harassment and discrimination. The revisions to the policy were first proposed shortly after the lawsuit was filed. The new policy creates new reporting responsibilities for supervisors and establishes a more specific range of disciplinary action. Assistant Attorney General Suzanne Parisien, who represents the university, said the agreement to sever ties with Gallegos was made in the best interest of the university. Parisien now will also defend Gallegos at trial. Information from: The Spokesman-Review,
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/ID_CALDER_SHOOTINGS_WAOL-?SITE=NJMOR&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT Daily Record - Nation & World Subscribe to our Daily Report newsletter May 11, 9:55 PM EDT Three dead, one wounded in N. Idaho family shootout CALDER, Idaho (AP) -- A woman was seriously wounded and her estranged husband was killed when the two exchanged gunfire, and her parents also died of apparent gunshot wounds, authorities said Friday. The three bodies and the injured woman were found Thursday in a northern Idaho home about 40 miles southeast of Coeur d'Alene, Shoshone County Sheriff Chuck Reynalds said. He said Rose Turner, 43, was shot in the eye area by her estranged husband, Ricky Turner, who was in his early 40s. Reynalds said Rose Turner's parents, whose names and ages have not been released, were found dead, seated in chairs in Rose Turner's doublewide mobile home. He said it didn't appear they were caught in a crossfire. A family friend said Ricky Turner was distraught over a pending divorce. Neighbors speculated a homicide-suicide had taken place at the home but police said that isn't what happened. "We're taking suicide out of the equation," Reynalds told a Friday morning news conference. Rose Turner was in serious condition at Sacred Heart Medical Center in Spokane, Wash. After Rose Turner, a certified nursing assistant, didn't show up for work on Thursday, another employee went to check on her, said Lisa Lloyd, a spokeswoman at Valley Vista Care Center in St. Maries. It is unclear how long Rose Turner lay wounded before the other employee arrived. A news release from the Shoshone County sheriff's office said the agency was notified at 7 p.m. Thursday. Sheriff's Sgt. Derek Dofelmire told The Associated Press that Rose Turner was lucky to be alive and "has been able to provide information to our investigators." Reynalds said two weapons were found: a small caliber gun and a large caliber gun. Julie "Tiny" Codoni, a family friend of the Turners, said Ricky Turner was despondent over his pending divorce. "He was in really bad shape," she said of a conversation she had with him on Wednesday. "He was hurting. He loved her. She was his life." She said the couple had three children, that Ricky Turner was disabled, and that Rose Turner's parents lived with her at the house. "(Rose Turner) had made comments over the last little while that he was going to kill her," Lloyd said. The Idaho State Police have been asked to help with the investigation. "This is uncommon, obviously, for us," Reynalds said. "We don't do that many homicides."
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/ID_CALDER_SHOOTINGS_WAOL-?SITE=NYNYP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News - New York Post Online Edition Work at the Post May 15, 10:45 AM EDT Autopsy: Calder man shot was four times before committing suicide WALLACE, Idaho (AP) -- An autopsy revealed that a man was shot four times by his wife in a shootout at the family home outside Calder before he committed suicide, Shoshone County authorities said. All told, eleven shots hit four people during the shooting Thursday that left three dead and one in the hospital with a head wound, Sheriff Charles "Chuck" Reynalds said. The lone survivor, Rose Turner, 43, whose parents and estranged husband were found dead at the house about 65 miles east-southeast of Spokane, Wash., remained at Sacred Heart Medical Center in Spokane for treatment of a wound near the eye. "We're hoping for an interview in the future," but authorities don't know how much she'll remember, Reynalds told The Spokesman-Review of Spokane on Monday. "Physically, she's doing well and lots better, but there are some other problems." Turner's father, Fred Smith, 71, was shot three times and her mother, Effie Smith, 68, was shot twice, all the shots coming from a .38-caliber handgun fired by her estranged husband, Rick Turner, believed to be in his early 40s, Reynalds said. Turner's parents were sitting in the living room when they were shot, investigators found. Her husband was hit by four shots from her .22-caliber weapon, one of which "would have been fatal over time," before he killed himself with a shot from his own gun, Reynalds said. In the days before the shooting, Turner told co-workers she feared her husband would kill her. A worried colleague went to the house, discovered the carnage and called the sheriff's office after turner failed to come to work Thursday. Information from: The Spokesman-Review, YORK POST is a registered trademark of NYP Holdings, Inc. NYPOST.COM, NYPOSTONLINE.COM, and NEWYORKPOST.COM are trademarks of NYP Holdings, Inc. Copyright 2007 NYP Holdings, Inc.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MICROSOFT_OPEN_SOURCE_WAOL-?SITE=NYNYP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News - New York Post Online Edition Work at the Post May 15, 3:14 PM EDT Microsoft says Linux, Open Office, free e-mail step on patents SEATTLE (AP) -- Microsoft Corp. cranked up the rhetoric against open-source software with new details about the ways it says free programs violate its patents. While the world's largest software company said it prefers licensing deals to legal action, it also indicated it won't ignore what it sees as infringement. "There is no reason why any segment of the industry needs to be exempt from intellectual property rules," said Horacio Gutierrez, a Microsoft vice president for intellectual property and licensing. At the most basic level, open-source software is built by a community of companies and independent programmers. It's distributed, often without charge, to businesses and consumers and programmers to modify, build on, and distribute again - also for free. While proprietary software companies like Microsoft make money by selling licenses for programs, open-source companies usually make money selling support services. On Monday, Microsoft said open-source programs step on 235 Microsoft patents. The core of the free Linux operating system violates 42 patents. Open-source programs' graphical user interfaces, or the way menus and windows look on the screen, breach 65. E-mail programs step on 15, and other programs violate 68 patents, the company said. The patent figures were first reported by Fortune magazine. Microsoft also said Open Office, an open-source program supported in part by Sun Microsystems Inc., infringes on 45 patents. Sun declined to comment on the allegation. Microsoft's Windows is the dominant software on servers and desktop PCs, but Microsoft views the free or low-cost Linux operating system alternatives "with a great deal of concern," said Al Gillen, an analyst at the technology research group IDC. "It's one of the few operating systems that represents a viable threat that Microsoft has a great deal of difficulty containing," Gillen said. Because open-source developers share their code, the challenge to Microsoft's products isn't limited to one company. Instead, Microsoft has struck a number of patent-licensing deals with companies that use open source code, most notably Novell Inc. last November. In one aspect of the deal, Microsoft agreed to sell Novell's flavor of Linux, called Suse. It also agreed not to sue the customers who bought it, even though it claims the open-source software infringes on its patents. "Microsoft could have chosen to litigate many years ago, but we have decided not to do that," Gutierrez said. Instead, in the interest of making sure programs that include open-source technology work with Microsoft products and vice versa, the company will continue to pursue similar deals. Much of the open-source community was unhappy with the Novell deal, which it saw as a workaround to a widely used open-source license called the GNU General Public License. More broadly, the free software movement saw the deal as an attack on one of its core tenets. Under the public license, once open-source code is incorporated into another company's technology, the new product must also be freely available. But the deal also required Novell to pay millions in "royalties" - an indirect admission that Suse Linux contained Microsoft intellectual property and can't be given away for free. "Now it becomes possible to divide and conquer our community," said Eben Moglen, an attorney for the Free Software Foundation, the entity behind the GNU license. By making a pact with Novell, Microsoft also implied that anyone who downloaded or bought Linux from another vendor was doing so illegally. The next version of the GNU license, currently in draft form, aims to stop similar deals. Moglen said the draft states that if a company like Microsoft distributes open-source programs protected by the GNU license, it forfeits any related patent claims. Open-source proponents are frustrated by Microsoft's repeated allusions to patent violations because "they never say what patents being violated, never make any assertions, never put the evidence out there," said Larry Augustin, a technology startup investor who launched SourceForge.net, a prominent open-source development site, in 1999. But Augustin also acknowledged that it's not in Microsoft's interest to do so: Open-source programmers could rewrite their code to avoid infringing on specific patents, or the courts could find that Microsoft's patent isn't valid. An ongoing open-source patent case could indicate that it isn't easy for a software maker to prove infringement. The SCO Group Inc., a Utah-based company, sued IBM Corp. in 2003 for donating its proprietary Unix code to open-source developers. Late last year, a federal judge upheld a decision to dismiss about half of the claims against IBM, agreeing that SCO had failed to identify exactly which lines of code in Linux infringed on its patents. Legal action by Microsoft could also kick off a massive patent war. An organization called the Open Innovation Network, funded by IBM, Red Hat Inc. and others, has amassed a vast number of software patents. If there is a Microsoft lawsuit against open source companies or customers, the OIN would retaliate in kind. "We believe it's highly likely that Microsoft would infringe some of our patents," said Jerry Rosenthal, OIN's chief executive. YORK POST is a registered trademark of NYP Holdings, Inc. NYPOST.COM, NYPOSTONLINE.COM, and NEWYORKPOST.COM are trademarks of NYP Holdings, Inc. Copyright 2007 NYP Holdings, Inc.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_OKE_OBIT_WAOL-?SITE=NYNYP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News - New York Post Online Edition Work at the Post May 15, 2:19 PM EDT Former Wash. state Sen. Bob Oke dies at 66 OLYMPIA, Wash. (AP) -- Former state Sen. Bob Oke, a senior Republican known for battling the tobacco industry and promoting a new Tacoma Narrows Bridge, has died after a public battle with a rare form of cancer. Oke, a 16-year veteran of the Senate, died Monday night after a three-year battle against multiple myeloma, which targets plasma cells and weakens the bones, the Senate Republican caucus said. He was 66. The Port Orchard conservative, a favorite with lawmakers on both sides of the political aisle before retiring in January, had been open about his struggles with the disease. He underwent stem-cell transplants twice, as well as chemotherapy and radiation therapy that kept the disease at bay for part of his final four-year term. He had missed part of the 2005 session and sometimes used a wheelchair or cane. He kept his fellow legislators abreast of his illness and various treatments. "A lot of prayer is needed, and I appreciate your support," he told the Senate at one point. "You've always been there for me." The Senate gave him tributes in both 2005 and 2006, with many of his colleagues openly crying. Senate Majority Leader Lisa Brown said during one tribute that Oke "greeted each day so courageously." "If you can address what you're addressing with such courage and grace, we should certainly do the same thing," she said. Oke, 66, a 26-year Navy veteran, was treated at the Veterans' Administration Hospital in Seattle. Oke, pronounced Oak, served four, four-year terms and was a leader of the natural resources and fisheries panel. He was best known for his staunch support for the new Narrows bridge, which will open in a few weeks, and for his efforts to combat youth smoking. YORK POST is a registered trademark of NYP Holdings, Inc. NYPOST.COM, NYPOSTONLINE.COM, and NEWYORKPOST.COM are trademarks of NYP Holdings, Inc. Copyright 2007 NYP Holdings, Inc.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_UW_TUITION_WAOL-?SITE=NYNYP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News - New York Post Online Edition Work at the Post May 15, 9:03 AM EDT University of Washington regents mull 7 percent tuition hike SEATTLE (AP) -- University of Washington regents are considering a 7 percent tuition hike, the maximum allowed by the state, which school officials say is needed to approach the funding levels of peer institutions. Under a measure on the regents' agenda for Thursday, costs for Washington residents attending the state's largest institution of higher learning would rise to $5,842 dollars in tuition and $525 dollars in fees for a total of $6,367 dollars a year. For out-of-state students, tuition would rise by 4 percent - another state-imposed maximum - to $21,588, while graduate and professional tuition would rise by 4 percent to 14 percent, depending on residency and field of study. Final action on tuition is expected at the Board of Regents meeting next month. A 7 percent undergraduate tuition increase already has been approved at Washington State University, boosting the total to $5,812 plus fees. The Legislature and governor approved an operating budget of $807 million for the University of Washington, the most generous for the school in decades, but higher tuition is needed to pay for scholarships, counseling, classroom technology, faculty pay and other improvements, Provost Phyllis M. Wise told the Seattle Post-Intelligencer. "We needed to have the money to provide the kind of education that we want to and felt that that was also justified because we still are behind our peers in terms of their tuition rates," Wise said. For the first time, she noted, the university is guaranteeing full-tuition scholarships for the neediest students under the Husky Promise program this fall. A 7 percent proposal was not unexpected, but "students are still disappointed that we aren't reducing the level of increases," said Bryce McKibben, a student who represents undergraduates in Olympia. Among the larger proposed graduate tuition increase, which are not subject to legislatively imposed limits, are 10 percent for pharmacy, law and medicine and 14 percent or more for the nursing doctorate program, formerly a master's degree program. In addition some master's programs, such as public health, would be recategorized and tuition would be raised to levels closer to what is charged by similar institutions, university officials said. "When we see that the government has put the 7 percent cap on the tuition for the undergrads, we know they're coming for us," said Kimberly Friese, president of the Graduate and Professional Student Senate. Information from: Seattle Post-Intelligencer, YORK POST is a registered trademark of NYP Holdings, Inc. NYPOST.COM, NYPOSTONLINE.COM, and NEWYORKPOST.COM are trademarks of NYP Holdings, Inc. Copyright 2007 NYP Holdings, Inc.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/ID_TRAVEL_SPENDING_NEW_DIRECTOR_WAOL-?SITE=NYNYP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News - New York Post Online Edition Work at the Post May 14, 9:15 PM EDT ID history group replaces director who quit in payment flap BOISE, Idaho (AP) -- The Idaho State Historical Society said Monday it has hired a new executive director, replacing the one who quit last year after auditors found he'd accepted thousands in improper payments and travel reimbursements. The money was later repaid. Janet L. Gallimore, who has headed up fundraising and community outreach at the public- and privately funded Confluence Project in Vancouver, Wash., starts next month in Boise. She replaces Steve Guerber, who quit in November after a state audit showed he banked $5,467.77 in improper reimbursements over a five-year period. At the Confluence Project, Gallimore worked with Vietnam War Memorial designer Maya Lin on seven art installations along the Columbia River - including one in Clarkston, Wash, across the river from Lewiston, Idaho. The sites are meant to highlight the Lewis and Clark expedition and its effect on the land and on the American Indians the explorers encountered. Keith Petersen, the coordinator of the Idaho Lewis and Clark Bicentennial Commemoration since 1999, has been interim Historical Society director since Guerber's exit. Board members of the state agency sought a new leader with both experience in history and administrative knowledge, Petersen said. "They were looking for that combination," said Peterson, whose salary was $75,000 annually. Gallimore won out over 34 other applicants in a national search, including 17 from within Idaho. Peterson, who didn't apply for the job, will return to his former post in Moscow, Idaho. Since he replaced Guerber, Petersen has overseen a slew of agency reforms including creating a new policy manual for staff. He also scheduled orientations to familiarize the roughly 50 full-time Historical Society employees with how to use state credit cards and file expense reports properly. Gallimore couldn't immediately be reached for comment. A Confluence Project staff member told The Associated Press she was in Chicago, where she worked for 22 years at the nearby Lake County Forest Preserve, including four as its cultural resources director. Phone calls to Ted Blanchard, chairman of the state Historical Society's board, also weren't immediately returned. Ada County prosecutors earlier this year opted not to prosecute Guerber, also a city councilman from the Boise suburb of Eagle. Prosecutors said Idaho law allows felony misuse-of-public-funds charges to be filed only against those officials whose explicit duty it is to safeguard public money. Guerber has said bookkeeping mistakes, not malfeasance, led to the improper reimbursements. He repaid the money. YORK POST is a registered trademark of NYP Holdings, Inc. NYPOST.COM, NYPOSTONLINE.COM, and NEWYORKPOST.COM are trademarks of NYP Holdings, Inc. Copyright 2007 NYP Holdings, Inc.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_WASH_JOBLESS_WAOL-?SITE=NYNYP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News - New York Post Online Edition Work at the Post May 15, 2:58 PM EDT WA jobless rate dips to record low 4.4 percent in April By RACHEL LA CORTE OLYMPIA, Wash. (AP) -- Washington's unemployment rate dipped to a record 4.4 percent last month, the lowest since comparable record-keeping more than three decades ago, the state Employment Security Department announced Tuesday. The seasonally adjusted rate was an improvement from the previous month's record low of 4.6 percent. In a prepared statement, Gov. Chris Gregoire said it was "even further proof that our state economy is one of the strongest and fastest-growing in the nation." Economists typically define anything below 5 percent as full employment. The state's employers added about 2,900 net new jobs last month, with the largest growth in professional and business services, with 2,100 new jobs. Construction saw an increase of 900, and other groups, like membership organizations, grew by 500. Manufacturing was down by 900 jobs, financial activities decreased by 100, and government lost 100. More than 64,400 net new jobs were created in Washington from April 2006 to April 2007. Nonfarm jobs increased by 2.3 percent, compared to a national rate of 1.4 percent. The state estimates that about 145,400 people are still unemployed. The national jobless rate is 4.5 percent, a slight increase over March's 4.4 percent and below the 4.7 percent of one year ago. One year ago, Washington's rate was 4.9 percent. Unemployment rates, not seasonally adjusted, in metropolitan areas around the state: Bellingham, 4 percent; Bremerton, 4.2; Longview, 5.9; Mount Vernon-Anacortes, 4.6; Olympia, 4.2; Seattle-Bellevue-Everett, 3.6; Spokane, 4.3; Tacoma, 4.7; Tri-Cities, 5.1; Wenatchee, 5.1; and Yakima, 6.1. These labor market areas also reported: Aberdeen, 7 percent; Centralia, 6.8; Ellensburg, 4.4; Moses Lake, 5.8; Oak Harbor, 4.8; Port Angeles, 5.3; Pullman, 3.4; Shelton, 5.6; and Walla Walla, 4.7. Unemployment rates in these counties were: Adams, 5.1 percent; Asotin, 4.6; Benton, 4.6; Chelan, 5.2; Clark, 5; Columbia, 6.4; Douglas, 4.7; Ferry, 9.2; Franklin, 6.6; Garfield, 4.2; Jefferson, 4.6; King, 3.5; Klickitat, 6.9; Lincoln, 5.1; Okanogan, 6.7; Pacific, 6.6; Pend Oreille, 7; San Juan, 3.3; Skamania, 5.6; Snohomish, 3.8; Stevens, 7.3; and Wahkiakum, 6.5. YORK POST is a registered trademark of NYP Holdings, Inc. NYPOST.COM, NYPOSTONLINE.COM, and NEWYORKPOST.COM are trademarks of NYP Holdings, Inc. Copyright 2007 NYP Holdings, Inc.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_STEVENSON_LANDSLIDE_WAOL-?SITE=NYNYP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News - New York Post Online Edition Work at the Post May 15, 12:46 AM EDT Couple burns home before landslide sweeps it away STEVENSON, Wash. (AP) -- A plume of smoke and the sound of breaking glass signaled the destruction of Bill and Annette LaCombe's dream home, one that had teetered on the edge of ruin for more than a year. The house sat on a bluff overlooking Rock Creek, but in the past year had been threatened by a slow-moving landslide that was eating away at the home's 2-acre site. Already having moved the house back once, Bill LaCombe decided to use his skills as a volunteer firefighter and burn the home to the ground. "I couldn't let it all slide into the creek, where my kids swim," said LaCombe, a Stevenson High School teacher in the community about 25 miles up the Columbia River from Portland, Ore. "It would have been easier to walk away, but now we won't have a huge mess in the canyon." On Saturday, LaCombe took a final walk through the home where he and his family had lived for more than eight years, before starting a series of fires throughout the house. Geologists believe a storm activated the slide. In January 2006, the community helped the LaCombes move the house 200 feet from the expanding canyon. "Those were sad days, wondering if it was going to be sliding down," said LaCombe, who moved out of the house three months ago with his wife and three sons. They've been staying with friends while planning to build a new home next month. "The garage was already starting to slide." Burning the house seemed the best option since the ground around the area was no longer stable. "It's not safe up there for heavy equipment," Skamania County Sheriff Dave Brown said from a vantage point on the other side of the canyon. "Without some action, it would all go down the hill, and that would be a whole other problem in terms of cleanup." As the house burned Saturday, chunks of the cliff continued to peel off, sending dirt and rocks skittering down the 250-foot slope. To prepare for the burn, LaCombe needed a fire permit and approval from the mortgage holder, GMAC Mortgage. Hazardous building materials, like asbestos, also had to be removed. LaCombe then tore out the drywall to expose the wooden framing, cut holes in the floor, and cut up load-bearing interior walls so the house would fold in on itself as it burned. The garage collapsed first Saturday, and by 7 a.m. smoke began billowing from the structure. The sound of breaking glass carried across the canyon as the windows shattered. Fire crews were onsite, using the burn as practice and to make sure the flames didn't spread to neighboring buildings. Information from: The Columbian, YORK POST is a registered trademark of NYP Holdings, Inc. NYPOST.COM, NYPOSTONLINE.COM, and NEWYORKPOST.COM are trademarks of NYP Holdings, Inc. Copyright 2007 NYP Holdings, Inc.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/O/ODD_MANGLED_HELMET_WAOL-?SITE=NYNYP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News - New York Post Online Edition Work at the Post May 15, 3:07 PM EDT Helmet saves Seattle cyclist after truck runs over his head MILWAUKEE (AP) -- Ryan Lipscomb lived to tell how it felt to have a truck run over his head. "Really strange," he said. Lipscomb, 26 of Seattle, suffered a concussion but was otherwise unhurt. He was shaken up, especially after he saw his mangled helmet. Lipscomb, a graduate student in medical physics at the University of Wisconsin-Madison, was riding down a bike path in Madison on Friday afternoon. As he approached an intersection, he said, he noticed the oncoming delivery truck preparing to make a right turn in front of him. The truck wasn't going to stop, Lipscomb said, so he slammed on his brakes, flipping his bike and landing in the street. A moment later the truck rolled over his head. "I didn't see it coming, but I sure felt it roll over my head," he told The Capital Times newspaper. "It feels really strange to have a truck run over your head." His black helmet was flattened, tread marks visible on the cracked frame. Lipscomb was taken to a hospital and released about three hours later. Police initially declined to call the incident a hit-and-run, saying it was unclear whether the driver knew someone had been hit. But Sgt. Bernie Gonzalez later updated the accident report to include the designation. Police spokesman Mike Hanson said Tuesday there haven't been any arrests because investigators haven't been able to identity the driver. In a telephone interview Tuesday with The Associated Press, Lipscomb said he has had some lingering headaches and a stiff neck. "All things considered, that's about as good as it can get," he said. Despite the close call, he said, he has to focus on school because his qualifying exam for the Ph.D program is next week. "I think it will probably hit me when I'm done with exams," Lipscomb said. Lipscomb does plan to ride again, he just prefers to wait until after exams are over. "After that, I'll go out and get a new helmet and be back on my bike," he said. YORK POST is a registered trademark of NYP Holdings, Inc. NYPOST.COM, NYPOSTONLINE.COM, and NEWYORKPOST.COM are trademarks of NYP Holdings, Inc. Copyright 2007 NYP Holdings, Inc.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_GANG_BAN_WAOL-?SITE=NYNYP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News - New York Post Online Edition Work at the Post May 15, 8:31 AM EDT Sunnyside weighs ordinance to make gang membership illegal SUNNYSIDE, Wash. (AP) -- An ordinance to outlaw membership in street gangs appears headed for approval in this lower Yakima Valley town, which a key official said was "in a state of crisis." City Council members voiced support for the move Monday, and Mayor Ed Prilucik says it would likely be approved at a special meeting next Monday. "It's a bold move," Prilucik said. The measure was considered on the same day a gang member convicted in Yakima as an accomplice in the drive-by killing of a man in Sunnyside. The proposal, modeled after a widely debated California state law, would be the first of its kind in Washington state. It would define a criminal gang as three or more people with an identifiable leadership, name, sign or symbol acting or conspiring mainly for ongoing criminal purposes. "The city of Sunnyside is in a state of crisis which has been caused by violent street gangs whose members threaten, terrorize and commit a multitude of crimes against the peaceful citizens of their neighborhood," municipal attorney Mark A. Kunkler wrote in a report to the council. Police in the town, population about 14,400, about know of at least 50 adults and 200 juveniles who fit that description, Kunkler wrote, but Police Chief Edwin L. Radder said there are likely many others. "That's a minimum estimate, based on individuals we are able to identify at this time," Radder said. Gang membership or participation in gang-related activity would be a gross misdemeanor punishable by a maximum of a year in jail. "Basically it shines a spotlight on that element of society," Radder said. "It takes away some of the anonymity." The parents of gang members could face civil penalties if they fail to do enough to keep their kids out of gangs. An earlier version would have subjected the parents of gang members to criminal prosecution. "We've got to get parents back to the idea that it's important to be involved with their children's lives," council member James A. Restucci said. The California law was opposed by the American Civil Liberties Union and California Attorneys for Criminal Justice as an infringement on the constitutional right to free association and assembly. An ACLU spokesman in Seattle, Doug Honig, said Monday he could not comment on the proposal in Sunnyside because he had not seen it. Kunkler said the state attorney general's office examined the proposed ordinance and believes it is constitutional. State legislation to impose tougher penalties for gang-related crimes failed to win passage in Olympia this year, council member William Gant complained. "The Legislature skirted the issue, and I think they have put that back on the local communities," Gant said. "I think it's time to step up." Amid the debate Monday, a Yakima County Superior Court jury convicted Michael "Li'l Evil" Rodriguez, 26, of being an accomplice to first-degree murder, plus first-degree unlawful possession of a firearm and tampering with a witness. Rodriguez, who has a lengthy criminal record and has been described by jail staff as extremely dangerous, faces more than 40 years in prison for his role in the death of Rosendo Hernandez, 29, of Sunnyside, on Christmas Eve 2005. No date was set for sentencing. Testimony indicated Rodriguez and Francisco Acevedo, 19, were cruising for rival gang members when they encountered Hernandez walking on a residential street in Sunnyside. Under a plea agreement with prosecutors, Acevedo testified that he shot Hernandez at almost point-blank range with a double-barreled shotgun. Prosecutors are recommending an 18-year, nine-month prison term for Acevedo. Information from: Yakima Herald-Republic, YORK POST is a registered trademark of NYP Holdings, Inc. NYPOST.COM, NYPOSTONLINE.COM, and NEWYORKPOST.COM are trademarks of NYP Holdings, Inc. Copyright 2007 NYP Holdings, Inc.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_BOEING_787_WAOL-?SITE=NYNYP&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT News - New York Post Online Edition Work at the Post May 15, 2:46 PM EDT Boeing superfreighter unloads wings of first 787 By ELIZABETH M. GILLESPIE EVERETT, Wash. (AP) -- An enormous cargo plane Boeing Co. built to fly major components of its new 787 jet delivered wings for the first Dreamliner to its widebody factory here Tuesday. The specially modified 747-400, dubbed the Dreamlifter, landed at Paine Field at 4:10 a.m., nearly 12 hours after it took off from Nagoya, Japan, where Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Co. manufactured the wings. The crew in charge of unloading the wings had them out of the cavernous cargo hold by sunrise. A 118-foot-long cargo loader with 32 wheels pulled up to the Dreamlifter after a support vehicle hooked onto the underside of the aircraft's tail, then slowly opened the rear of the plane as if it were a door. Inside, the two nearly 100-foot-long wings were propped up high near the plane's ceiling, secured by tools that kept them in place during flight. A handful of Boeing workers clapped and cheered as the wings slid onto the platform of the cargo loader, which then whisked them away to the factory in this city north of Seattle where workers will soon begin the final stages of assembling the first 787. To date, Boeing has sold 567 of its midsize, long-haul 787s to 44 customers. The Chicago-based aerospace company said that makes its Dreamliner the fastest-selling new jet in commercial aviation history. Boeing has said the 787, made mostly of light, sturdy carbon-fiber composites, will burn about 20 percent less fuel than comparable jets flying today and will cost less to maintain because composites are more durable than aluminum. Scott Strode, vice president of airplane definition and production for the 787, said a composite wing as large as the 787's has never been built before. The only large section that's left for the Dreamlifter to deliver is the mid-body fuselage, pieces of which are made in Italy and Japan then joined together at Boeing's joint-venture partner Global Aeronautica in Charleston, S.C., Boeing spokesman Mary Hanson said. The plane's nose and two other fuselage sections arrived last Friday, and the horizontal stabilizer - part of the tail - was delivered in late April. Boeing officials say the company remains on track to roll out its first 787 on July 8, the calendar equivalent of 7-8-7. The first test flight is planned for late August, and the plane is expected to enter service in May 2008. YORK POST is a registered trademark of NYP Holdings, Inc. NYPOST.COM, NYPOSTONLINE.COM, and NEWYORKPOST.COM are trademarks of NYP Holdings, Inc. Copyright 2007 NYP Holdings, Inc.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/O/ODD_MANGLED_HELMET_WAOL-?SITE=MAQUI&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT SouthofBoston.com: News from the Associated Press Includes content from the Old Colony Memorial, MPG Newspapers and more. Video of the Day The Day in Photos Iraq War Casualties Database 400 Crown Colony Drive, May 15, 3:07 PM EDT Helmet saves Seattle cyclist after truck runs over his head MILWAUKEE (AP) -- Ryan Lipscomb lived to tell how it felt to have a truck run over his head. "Really strange," he said. Lipscomb, 26 of Seattle, suffered a concussion but was otherwise unhurt. He was shaken up, especially after he saw his mangled helmet. Lipscomb, a graduate student in medical physics at the University of Wisconsin-Madison, was riding down a bike path in Madison on Friday afternoon. As he approached an intersection, he said, he noticed the oncoming delivery truck preparing to make a right turn in front of him. The truck wasn't going to stop, Lipscomb said, so he slammed on his brakes, flipping his bike and landing in the street. A moment later the truck rolled over his head. "I didn't see it coming, but I sure felt it roll over my head," he told The Capital Times newspaper. "It feels really strange to have a truck run over your head." His black helmet was flattened, tread marks visible on the cracked frame. Lipscomb was taken to a hospital and released about three hours later. Police initially declined to call the incident a hit-and-run, saying it was unclear whether the driver knew someone had been hit. But Sgt. Bernie Gonzalez later updated the accident report to include the designation. Police spokesman Mike Hanson said Tuesday there haven't been any arrests because investigators haven't been able to identity the driver. In a telephone interview Tuesday with The Associated Press, Lipscomb said he has had some lingering headaches and a stiff neck. "All things considered, that's about as good as it can get," he said. Despite the close call, he said, he has to focus on school because his qualifying exam for the Ph.D program is next week. "I think it will probably hit me when I'm done with exams," Lipscomb said. Lipscomb does plan to ride again, he just prefers to wait until after exams are over. "After that, I'll go out and get a new helmet and be back on my bike," he said. of Boston Media Group , 400 Crown Colony Drive P.O. Box 699159, Quincy, MA 02269-9159 Telephone: (617) 786-7333; Fax: (617) 786-7193; E-mail:
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/ID_CALDER_SHOOTINGS_WAOL-?SITE=MAQUI&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT SouthofBoston.com: News from the Associated Press Includes content from the Old Colony Memorial, MPG Newspapers and more. Video of the Day The Day in Photos Iraq War Casualties Database 400 Crown Colony Drive, May 15, 10:45 AM EDT Autopsy: Calder man shot was four times before committing suicide WALLACE, Idaho (AP) -- An autopsy revealed that a man was shot four times by his wife in a shootout at the family home outside Calder before he committed suicide, Shoshone County authorities said. All told, eleven shots hit four people during the shooting Thursday that left three dead and one in the hospital with a head wound, Sheriff Charles "Chuck" Reynalds said. The lone survivor, Rose Turner, 43, whose parents and estranged husband were found dead at the house about 65 miles east-southeast of Spokane, Wash., remained at Sacred Heart Medical Center in Spokane for treatment of a wound near the eye. "We're hoping for an interview in the future," but authorities don't know how much she'll remember, Reynalds told The Spokesman-Review of Spokane on Monday. "Physically, she's doing well and lots better, but there are some other problems." Turner's father, Fred Smith, 71, was shot three times and her mother, Effie Smith, 68, was shot twice, all the shots coming from a .38-caliber handgun fired by her estranged husband, Rick Turner, believed to be in his early 40s, Reynalds said. Turner's parents were sitting in the living room when they were shot, investigators found. Her husband was hit by four shots from her .22-caliber weapon, one of which "would have been fatal over time," before he killed himself with a shot from his own gun, Reynalds said. In the days before the shooting, Turner told co-workers she feared her husband would kill her. A worried colleague went to the house, discovered the carnage and called the sheriff's office after turner failed to come to work Thursday. Information from: The Spokesman-Review, of Boston Media Group , 400 Crown Colony Drive P.O. Box 699159, Quincy, MA 02269-9159 Telephone: (617) 786-7333; Fax: (617) 786-7193; E-mail:
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MICROSOFT_OPEN_SOURCE_WAOL-?SITE=MAQUI&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT SouthofBoston.com: News from the Associated Press Includes content from the Old Colony Memorial, MPG Newspapers and more. Video of the Day The Day in Photos Iraq War Casualties Database 400 Crown Colony Drive, May 15, 3:14 PM EDT Microsoft says Linux, Open Office, free e-mail step on patents SEATTLE (AP) -- Microsoft Corp. cranked up the rhetoric against open-source software with new details about the ways it says free programs violate its patents. While the world's largest software company said it prefers licensing deals to legal action, it also indicated it won't ignore what it sees as infringement. "There is no reason why any segment of the industry needs to be exempt from intellectual property rules," said Horacio Gutierrez, a Microsoft vice president for intellectual property and licensing. At the most basic level, open-source software is built by a community of companies and independent programmers. It's distributed, often without charge, to businesses and consumers and programmers to modify, build on, and distribute again - also for free. While proprietary software companies like Microsoft make money by selling licenses for programs, open-source companies usually make money selling support services. On Monday, Microsoft said open-source programs step on 235 Microsoft patents. The core of the free Linux operating system violates 42 patents. Open-source programs' graphical user interfaces, or the way menus and windows look on the screen, breach 65. E-mail programs step on 15, and other programs violate 68 patents, the company said. The patent figures were first reported by Fortune magazine. Microsoft also said Open Office, an open-source program supported in part by Sun Microsystems Inc., infringes on 45 patents. Sun declined to comment on the allegation. Microsoft's Windows is the dominant software on servers and desktop PCs, but Microsoft views the free or low-cost Linux operating system alternatives "with a great deal of concern," said Al Gillen, an analyst at the technology research group IDC. "It's one of the few operating systems that represents a viable threat that Microsoft has a great deal of difficulty containing," Gillen said. Because open-source developers share their code, the challenge to Microsoft's products isn't limited to one company. Instead, Microsoft has struck a number of patent-licensing deals with companies that use open source code, most notably Novell Inc. last November. In one aspect of the deal, Microsoft agreed to sell Novell's flavor of Linux, called Suse. It also agreed not to sue the customers who bought it, even though it claims the open-source software infringes on its patents. "Microsoft could have chosen to litigate many years ago, but we have decided not to do that," Gutierrez said. Instead, in the interest of making sure programs that include open-source technology work with Microsoft products and vice versa, the company will continue to pursue similar deals. Much of the open-source community was unhappy with the Novell deal, which it saw as a workaround to a widely used open-source license called the GNU General Public License. More broadly, the free software movement saw the deal as an attack on one of its core tenets. Under the public license, once open-source code is incorporated into another company's technology, the new product must also be freely available. But the deal also required Novell to pay millions in "royalties" - an indirect admission that Suse Linux contained Microsoft intellectual property and can't be given away for free. "Now it becomes possible to divide and conquer our community," said Eben Moglen, an attorney for the Free Software Foundation, the entity behind the GNU license. By making a pact with Novell, Microsoft also implied that anyone who downloaded or bought Linux from another vendor was doing so illegally. The next version of the GNU license, currently in draft form, aims to stop similar deals. Moglen said the draft states that if a company like Microsoft distributes open-source programs protected by the GNU license, it forfeits any related patent claims. Open-source proponents are frustrated by Microsoft's repeated allusions to patent violations because "they never say what patents being violated, never make any assertions, never put the evidence out there," said Larry Augustin, a technology startup investor who launched SourceForge.net, a prominent open-source development site, in 1999. But Augustin also acknowledged that it's not in Microsoft's interest to do so: Open-source programmers could rewrite their code to avoid infringing on specific patents, or the courts could find that Microsoft's patent isn't valid. An ongoing open-source patent case could indicate that it isn't easy for a software maker to prove infringement. The SCO Group Inc., a Utah-based company, sued IBM Corp. in 2003 for donating its proprietary Unix code to open-source developers. Late last year, a federal judge upheld a decision to dismiss about half of the claims against IBM, agreeing that SCO had failed to identify exactly which lines of code in Linux infringed on its patents. Legal action by Microsoft could also kick off a massive patent war. An organization called the Open Innovation Network, funded by IBM, Red Hat Inc. and others, has amassed a vast number of software patents. If there is a Microsoft lawsuit against open source companies or customers, the OIN would retaliate in kind. "We believe it's highly likely that Microsoft would infringe some of our patents," said Jerry Rosenthal, OIN's chief executive. of Boston Media Group , 400 Crown Colony Drive P.O. Box 699159, Quincy, MA 02269-9159 Telephone: (617) 786-7333; Fax: (617) 786-7193; E-mail:
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_STEVENSON_LANDSLIDE_WAOL-?SITE=MAQUI&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT SouthofBoston.com: News from the Associated Press Includes content from the Old Colony Memorial, MPG Newspapers and more. Video of the Day The Day in Photos Iraq War Casualties Database 400 Crown Colony Drive, May 15, 12:46 AM EDT Couple burns home before landslide sweeps it away STEVENSON, Wash. (AP) -- A plume of smoke and the sound of breaking glass signaled the destruction of Bill and Annette LaCombe's dream home, one that had teetered on the edge of ruin for more than a year. The house sat on a bluff overlooking Rock Creek, but in the past year had been threatened by a slow-moving landslide that was eating away at the home's 2-acre site. Already having moved the house back once, Bill LaCombe decided to use his skills as a volunteer firefighter and burn the home to the ground. "I couldn't let it all slide into the creek, where my kids swim," said LaCombe, a Stevenson High School teacher in the community about 25 miles up the Columbia River from Portland, Ore. "It would have been easier to walk away, but now we won't have a huge mess in the canyon." On Saturday, LaCombe took a final walk through the home where he and his family had lived for more than eight years, before starting a series of fires throughout the house. Geologists believe a storm activated the slide. In January 2006, the community helped the LaCombes move the house 200 feet from the expanding canyon. "Those were sad days, wondering if it was going to be sliding down," said LaCombe, who moved out of the house three months ago with his wife and three sons. They've been staying with friends while planning to build a new home next month. "The garage was already starting to slide." Burning the house seemed the best option since the ground around the area was no longer stable. "It's not safe up there for heavy equipment," Skamania County Sheriff Dave Brown said from a vantage point on the other side of the canyon. "Without some action, it would all go down the hill, and that would be a whole other problem in terms of cleanup." As the house burned Saturday, chunks of the cliff continued to peel off, sending dirt and rocks skittering down the 250-foot slope. To prepare for the burn, LaCombe needed a fire permit and approval from the mortgage holder, GMAC Mortgage. Hazardous building materials, like asbestos, also had to be removed. LaCombe then tore out the drywall to expose the wooden framing, cut holes in the floor, and cut up load-bearing interior walls so the house would fold in on itself as it burned. The garage collapsed first Saturday, and by 7 a.m. smoke began billowing from the structure. The sound of breaking glass carried across the canyon as the windows shattered. Fire crews were onsite, using the burn as practice and to make sure the flames didn't spread to neighboring buildings. Information from: The Columbian, of Boston Media Group , 400 Crown Colony Drive P.O. Box 699159, Quincy, MA 02269-9159 Telephone: (617) 786-7333; Fax: (617) 786-7193; E-mail:
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_UW_TUITION_WAOL-?SITE=MAQUI&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT SouthofBoston.com: News from the Associated Press Includes content from the Old Colony Memorial, MPG Newspapers and more. Video of the Day The Day in Photos Iraq War Casualties Database 400 Crown Colony Drive, May 15, 9:03 AM EDT University of Washington regents mull 7 percent tuition hike SEATTLE (AP) -- University of Washington regents are considering a 7 percent tuition hike, the maximum allowed by the state, which school officials say is needed to approach the funding levels of peer institutions. Under a measure on the regents' agenda for Thursday, costs for Washington residents attending the state's largest institution of higher learning would rise to $5,842 dollars in tuition and $525 dollars in fees for a total of $6,367 dollars a year. For out-of-state students, tuition would rise by 4 percent - another state-imposed maximum - to $21,588, while graduate and professional tuition would rise by 4 percent to 14 percent, depending on residency and field of study. Final action on tuition is expected at the Board of Regents meeting next month. A 7 percent undergraduate tuition increase already has been approved at Washington State University, boosting the total to $5,812 plus fees. The Legislature and governor approved an operating budget of $807 million for the University of Washington, the most generous for the school in decades, but higher tuition is needed to pay for scholarships, counseling, classroom technology, faculty pay and other improvements, Provost Phyllis M. Wise told the Seattle Post-Intelligencer. "We needed to have the money to provide the kind of education that we want to and felt that that was also justified because we still are behind our peers in terms of their tuition rates," Wise said. For the first time, she noted, the university is guaranteeing full-tuition scholarships for the neediest students under the Husky Promise program this fall. A 7 percent proposal was not unexpected, but "students are still disappointed that we aren't reducing the level of increases," said Bryce McKibben, a student who represents undergraduates in Olympia. Among the larger proposed graduate tuition increase, which are not subject to legislatively imposed limits, are 10 percent for pharmacy, law and medicine and 14 percent or more for the nursing doctorate program, formerly a master's degree program. In addition some master's programs, such as public health, would be recategorized and tuition would be raised to levels closer to what is charged by similar institutions, university officials said. "When we see that the government has put the 7 percent cap on the tuition for the undergrads, we know they're coming for us," said Kimberly Friese, president of the Graduate and Professional Student Senate. Information from: Seattle Post-Intelligencer, of Boston Media Group , 400 Crown Colony Drive P.O. Box 699159, Quincy, MA 02269-9159 Telephone: (617) 786-7333; Fax: (617) 786-7193; E-mail:
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_WASH_JOBLESS_WAOL-?SITE=MAQUI&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT SouthofBoston.com: News from the Associated Press Includes content from the Old Colony Memorial, MPG Newspapers and more. Video of the Day The Day in Photos Iraq War Casualties Database 400 Crown Colony Drive, May 15, 2:58 PM EDT WA jobless rate dips to record low 4.4 percent in April By RACHEL LA CORTE OLYMPIA, Wash. (AP) -- Washington's unemployment rate dipped to a record 4.4 percent last month, the lowest since comparable record-keeping more than three decades ago, the state Employment Security Department announced Tuesday. The seasonally adjusted rate was an improvement from the previous month's record low of 4.6 percent. In a prepared statement, Gov. Chris Gregoire said it was "even further proof that our state economy is one of the strongest and fastest-growing in the nation." Economists typically define anything below 5 percent as full employment. The state's employers added about 2,900 net new jobs last month, with the largest growth in professional and business services, with 2,100 new jobs. Construction saw an increase of 900, and other groups, like membership organizations, grew by 500. Manufacturing was down by 900 jobs, financial activities decreased by 100, and government lost 100. More than 64,400 net new jobs were created in Washington from April 2006 to April 2007. Nonfarm jobs increased by 2.3 percent, compared to a national rate of 1.4 percent. The state estimates that about 145,400 people are still unemployed. The national jobless rate is 4.5 percent, a slight increase over March's 4.4 percent and below the 4.7 percent of one year ago. One year ago, Washington's rate was 4.9 percent. Unemployment rates, not seasonally adjusted, in metropolitan areas around the state: Bellingham, 4 percent; Bremerton, 4.2; Longview, 5.9; Mount Vernon-Anacortes, 4.6; Olympia, 4.2; Seattle-Bellevue-Everett, 3.6; Spokane, 4.3; Tacoma, 4.7; Tri-Cities, 5.1; Wenatchee, 5.1; and Yakima, 6.1. These labor market areas also reported: Aberdeen, 7 percent; Centralia, 6.8; Ellensburg, 4.4; Moses Lake, 5.8; Oak Harbor, 4.8; Port Angeles, 5.3; Pullman, 3.4; Shelton, 5.6; and Walla Walla, 4.7. Unemployment rates in these counties were: Adams, 5.1 percent; Asotin, 4.6; Benton, 4.6; Chelan, 5.2; Clark, 5; Columbia, 6.4; Douglas, 4.7; Ferry, 9.2; Franklin, 6.6; Garfield, 4.2; Jefferson, 4.6; King, 3.5; Klickitat, 6.9; Lincoln, 5.1; Okanogan, 6.7; Pacific, 6.6; Pend Oreille, 7; San Juan, 3.3; Skamania, 5.6; Snohomish, 3.8; Stevens, 7.3; and Wahkiakum, 6.5. of Boston Media Group , 400 Crown Colony Drive P.O. Box 699159, Quincy, MA 02269-9159 Telephone: (617) 786-7333; Fax: (617) 786-7193; E-mail:
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_GANG_BAN_WAOL-?SITE=MAQUI&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT SouthofBoston.com: News from the Associated Press Includes content from the Old Colony Memorial, MPG Newspapers and more. Video of the Day The Day in Photos Iraq War Casualties Database 400 Crown Colony Drive, May 15, 8:31 AM EDT Sunnyside weighs ordinance to make gang membership illegal SUNNYSIDE, Wash. (AP) -- An ordinance to outlaw membership in street gangs appears headed for approval in this lower Yakima Valley town, which a key official said was "in a state of crisis." City Council members voiced support for the move Monday, and Mayor Ed Prilucik says it would likely be approved at a special meeting next Monday. "It's a bold move," Prilucik said. The measure was considered on the same day a gang member convicted in Yakima as an accomplice in the drive-by killing of a man in Sunnyside. The proposal, modeled after a widely debated California state law, would be the first of its kind in Washington state. It would define a criminal gang as three or more people with an identifiable leadership, name, sign or symbol acting or conspiring mainly for ongoing criminal purposes. "The city of Sunnyside is in a state of crisis which has been caused by violent street gangs whose members threaten, terrorize and commit a multitude of crimes against the peaceful citizens of their neighborhood," municipal attorney Mark A. Kunkler wrote in a report to the council. Police in the town, population about 14,400, about know of at least 50 adults and 200 juveniles who fit that description, Kunkler wrote, but Police Chief Edwin L. Radder said there are likely many others. "That's a minimum estimate, based on individuals we are able to identify at this time," Radder said. Gang membership or participation in gang-related activity would be a gross misdemeanor punishable by a maximum of a year in jail. "Basically it shines a spotlight on that element of society," Radder said. "It takes away some of the anonymity." The parents of gang members could face civil penalties if they fail to do enough to keep their kids out of gangs. An earlier version would have subjected the parents of gang members to criminal prosecution. "We've got to get parents back to the idea that it's important to be involved with their children's lives," council member James A. Restucci said. The California law was opposed by the American Civil Liberties Union and California Attorneys for Criminal Justice as an infringement on the constitutional right to free association and assembly. An ACLU spokesman in Seattle, Doug Honig, said Monday he could not comment on the proposal in Sunnyside because he had not seen it. Kunkler said the state attorney general's office examined the proposed ordinance and believes it is constitutional. State legislation to impose tougher penalties for gang-related crimes failed to win passage in Olympia this year, council member William Gant complained. "The Legislature skirted the issue, and I think they have put that back on the local communities," Gant said. "I think it's time to step up." Amid the debate Monday, a Yakima County Superior Court jury convicted Michael "Li'l Evil" Rodriguez, 26, of being an accomplice to first-degree murder, plus first-degree unlawful possession of a firearm and tampering with a witness. Rodriguez, who has a lengthy criminal record and has been described by jail staff as extremely dangerous, faces more than 40 years in prison for his role in the death of Rosendo Hernandez, 29, of Sunnyside, on Christmas Eve 2005. No date was set for sentencing. Testimony indicated Rodriguez and Francisco Acevedo, 19, were cruising for rival gang members when they encountered Hernandez walking on a residential street in Sunnyside. Under a plea agreement with prosecutors, Acevedo testified that he shot Hernandez at almost point-blank range with a double-barreled shotgun. Prosecutors are recommending an 18-year, nine-month prison term for Acevedo. Information from: Yakima Herald-Republic, of Boston Media Group , 400 Crown Colony Drive P.O. Box 699159, Quincy, MA 02269-9159 Telephone: (617) 786-7333; Fax: (617) 786-7193; E-mail:
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/ID_TRAVEL_SPENDING_NEW_DIRECTOR_WAOL-?SITE=MAQUI&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT SouthofBoston.com: News from the Associated Press Includes content from the Old Colony Memorial, MPG Newspapers and more. Video of the Day The Day in Photos Iraq War Casualties Database 400 Crown Colony Drive, May 14, 9:15 PM EDT ID history group replaces director who quit in payment flap BOISE, Idaho (AP) -- The Idaho State Historical Society said Monday it has hired a new executive director, replacing the one who quit last year after auditors found he'd accepted thousands in improper payments and travel reimbursements. The money was later repaid. Janet L. Gallimore, who has headed up fundraising and community outreach at the public- and privately funded Confluence Project in Vancouver, Wash., starts next month in Boise. She replaces Steve Guerber, who quit in November after a state audit showed he banked $5,467.77 in improper reimbursements over a five-year period. At the Confluence Project, Gallimore worked with Vietnam War Memorial designer Maya Lin on seven art installations along the Columbia River - including one in Clarkston, Wash, across the river from Lewiston, Idaho. The sites are meant to highlight the Lewis and Clark expedition and its effect on the land and on the American Indians the explorers encountered. Keith Petersen, the coordinator of the Idaho Lewis and Clark Bicentennial Commemoration since 1999, has been interim Historical Society director since Guerber's exit. Board members of the state agency sought a new leader with both experience in history and administrative knowledge, Petersen said. "They were looking for that combination," said Peterson, whose salary was $75,000 annually. Gallimore won out over 34 other applicants in a national search, including 17 from within Idaho. Peterson, who didn't apply for the job, will return to his former post in Moscow, Idaho. Since he replaced Guerber, Petersen has overseen a slew of agency reforms including creating a new policy manual for staff. He also scheduled orientations to familiarize the roughly 50 full-time Historical Society employees with how to use state credit cards and file expense reports properly. Gallimore couldn't immediately be reached for comment. A Confluence Project staff member told The Associated Press she was in Chicago, where she worked for 22 years at the nearby Lake County Forest Preserve, including four as its cultural resources director. Phone calls to Ted Blanchard, chairman of the state Historical Society's board, also weren't immediately returned. Ada County prosecutors earlier this year opted not to prosecute Guerber, also a city councilman from the Boise suburb of Eagle. Prosecutors said Idaho law allows felony misuse-of-public-funds charges to be filed only against those officials whose explicit duty it is to safeguard public money. Guerber has said bookkeeping mistakes, not malfeasance, led to the improper reimbursements. He repaid the money. of Boston Media Group , 400 Crown Colony Drive P.O. Box 699159, Quincy, MA 02269-9159 Telephone: (617) 786-7333; Fax: (617) 786-7193; E-mail:
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_BOEING_787_WAOL-?SITE=MAQUI&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT SouthofBoston.com: News from the Associated Press Includes content from the Old Colony Memorial, MPG Newspapers and more. Video of the Day The Day in Photos Iraq War Casualties Database 400 Crown Colony Drive, May 15, 2:46 PM EDT Boeing superfreighter unloads wings of first 787 By ELIZABETH M. GILLESPIE EVERETT, Wash. (AP) -- An enormous cargo plane Boeing Co. built to fly major components of its new 787 jet delivered wings for the first Dreamliner to its widebody factory here Tuesday. The specially modified 747-400, dubbed the Dreamlifter, landed at Paine Field at 4:10 a.m., nearly 12 hours after it took off from Nagoya, Japan, where Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Co. manufactured the wings. The crew in charge of unloading the wings had them out of the cavernous cargo hold by sunrise. A 118-foot-long cargo loader with 32 wheels pulled up to the Dreamlifter after a support vehicle hooked onto the underside of the aircraft's tail, then slowly opened the rear of the plane as if it were a door. Inside, the two nearly 100-foot-long wings were propped up high near the plane's ceiling, secured by tools that kept them in place during flight. A handful of Boeing workers clapped and cheered as the wings slid onto the platform of the cargo loader, which then whisked them away to the factory in this city north of Seattle where workers will soon begin the final stages of assembling the first 787. To date, Boeing has sold 567 of its midsize, long-haul 787s to 44 customers. The Chicago-based aerospace company said that makes its Dreamliner the fastest-selling new jet in commercial aviation history. Boeing has said the 787, made mostly of light, sturdy carbon-fiber composites, will burn about 20 percent less fuel than comparable jets flying today and will cost less to maintain because composites are more durable than aluminum. Scott Strode, vice president of airplane definition and production for the 787, said a composite wing as large as the 787's has never been built before. The only large section that's left for the Dreamlifter to deliver is the mid-body fuselage, pieces of which are made in Italy and Japan then joined together at Boeing's joint-venture partner Global Aeronautica in Charleston, S.C., Boeing spokesman Mary Hanson said. The plane's nose and two other fuselage sections arrived last Friday, and the horizontal stabilizer - part of the tail - was delivered in late April. Boeing officials say the company remains on track to roll out its first 787 on July 8, the calendar equivalent of 7-8-7. The first test flight is planned for late August, and the plane is expected to enter service in May 2008. of Boston Media Group , 400 Crown Colony Drive P.O. Box 699159, Quincy, MA 02269-9159 Telephone: (617) 786-7333; Fax: (617) 786-7193; E-mail:
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_OKE_OBIT_WAOL-?SITE=MAQUI&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT SouthofBoston.com: News from the Associated Press Includes content from the Old Colony Memorial, MPG Newspapers and more. Video of the Day The Day in Photos Iraq War Casualties Database 400 Crown Colony Drive, May 15, 2:19 PM EDT Former Wash. state Sen. Bob Oke dies at 66 OLYMPIA, Wash. (AP) -- Former state Sen. Bob Oke, a senior Republican known for battling the tobacco industry and promoting a new Tacoma Narrows Bridge, has died after a public battle with a rare form of cancer. Oke, a 16-year veteran of the Senate, died Monday night after a three-year battle against multiple myeloma, which targets plasma cells and weakens the bones, the Senate Republican caucus said. He was 66. The Port Orchard conservative, a favorite with lawmakers on both sides of the political aisle before retiring in January, had been open about his struggles with the disease. He underwent stem-cell transplants twice, as well as chemotherapy and radiation therapy that kept the disease at bay for part of his final four-year term. He had missed part of the 2005 session and sometimes used a wheelchair or cane. He kept his fellow legislators abreast of his illness and various treatments. "A lot of prayer is needed, and I appreciate your support," he told the Senate at one point. "You've always been there for me." The Senate gave him tributes in both 2005 and 2006, with many of his colleagues openly crying. Senate Majority Leader Lisa Brown said during one tribute that Oke "greeted each day so courageously." "If you can address what you're addressing with such courage and grace, we should certainly do the same thing," she said. Oke, 66, a 26-year Navy veteran, was treated at the Veterans' Administration Hospital in Seattle. Oke, pronounced Oak, served four, four-year terms and was a leader of the natural resources and fisheries panel. He was best known for his staunch support for the new Narrows bridge, which will open in a few weeks, and for his efforts to combat youth smoking. of Boston Media Group , 400 Crown Colony Drive P.O. Box 699159, Quincy, MA 02269-9159 Telephone: (617) 786-7333; Fax: (617) 786-7193; E-mail:
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/O/ODD_MANGLED_HELMET_WAOL-?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT GazetteOnline - AP News Gazette Online - Cedar Rapids, Iowa City, Eastern Iowa Cedar Rapids - IowaCity - Eastern Iowa May 15, 3:07 PM EDT Helmet saves Seattle cyclist after truck runs over his head MILWAUKEE (AP) -- Ryan Lipscomb lived to tell how it felt to have a truck run over his head. "Really strange," he said. Lipscomb, 26 of Seattle, suffered a concussion but was otherwise unhurt. He was shaken up, especially after he saw his mangled helmet. Lipscomb, a graduate student in medical physics at the University of Wisconsin-Madison, was riding down a bike path in Madison on Friday afternoon. As he approached an intersection, he said, he noticed the oncoming delivery truck preparing to make a right turn in front of him. The truck wasn't going to stop, Lipscomb said, so he slammed on his brakes, flipping his bike and landing in the street. A moment later the truck rolled over his head. "I didn't see it coming, but I sure felt it roll over my head," he told The Capital Times newspaper. "It feels really strange to have a truck run over your head." His black helmet was flattened, tread marks visible on the cracked frame. Lipscomb was taken to a hospital and released about three hours later. Police initially declined to call the incident a hit-and-run, saying it was unclear whether the driver knew someone had been hit. But Sgt. Bernie Gonzalez later updated the accident report to include the designation. Police spokesman Mike Hanson said Tuesday there haven't been any arrests because investigators haven't been able to identity the driver. In a telephone interview Tuesday with The Associated Press, Lipscomb said he has had some lingering headaches and a stiff neck. "All things considered, that's about as good as it can get," he said. Despite the close call, he said, he has to focus on school because his qualifying exam for the Ph.D program is next week. "I think it will probably hit me when I'm done with exams," Lipscomb said. Lipscomb does plan to ride again, he just prefers to wait until after exams are over. "After that, I'll go out and get a new helmet and be back on my bike," he said.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/M/MICROSOFT_OPEN_SOURCE_WAOL-?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT GazetteOnline - AP News Gazette Online - Cedar Rapids, Iowa City, Eastern Iowa Cedar Rapids - IowaCity - Eastern Iowa May 15, 3:14 PM EDT Microsoft says Linux, Open Office, free e-mail step on patents SEATTLE (AP) -- Microsoft Corp. cranked up the rhetoric against open-source software with new details about the ways it says free programs violate its patents. While the world's largest software company said it prefers licensing deals to legal action, it also indicated it won't ignore what it sees as infringement. "There is no reason why any segment of the industry needs to be exempt from intellectual property rules," said Horacio Gutierrez, a Microsoft vice president for intellectual property and licensing. At the most basic level, open-source software is built by a community of companies and independent programmers. It's distributed, often without charge, to businesses and consumers and programmers to modify, build on, and distribute again - also for free. While proprietary software companies like Microsoft make money by selling licenses for programs, open-source companies usually make money selling support services. On Monday, Microsoft said open-source programs step on 235 Microsoft patents. The core of the free Linux operating system violates 42 patents. Open-source programs' graphical user interfaces, or the way menus and windows look on the screen, breach 65. E-mail programs step on 15, and other programs violate 68 patents, the company said. The patent figures were first reported by Fortune magazine. Microsoft also said Open Office, an open-source program supported in part by Sun Microsystems Inc., infringes on 45 patents. Sun declined to comment on the allegation. Microsoft's Windows is the dominant software on servers and desktop PCs, but Microsoft views the free or low-cost Linux operating system alternatives "with a great deal of concern," said Al Gillen, an analyst at the technology research group IDC. "It's one of the few operating systems that represents a viable threat that Microsoft has a great deal of difficulty containing," Gillen said. Because open-source developers share their code, the challenge to Microsoft's products isn't limited to one company. Instead, Microsoft has struck a number of patent-licensing deals with companies that use open source code, most notably Novell Inc. last November. In one aspect of the deal, Microsoft agreed to sell Novell's flavor of Linux, called Suse. It also agreed not to sue the customers who bought it, even though it claims the open-source software infringes on its patents. "Microsoft could have chosen to litigate many years ago, but we have decided not to do that," Gutierrez said. Instead, in the interest of making sure programs that include open-source technology work with Microsoft products and vice versa, the company will continue to pursue similar deals. Much of the open-source community was unhappy with the Novell deal, which it saw as a workaround to a widely used open-source license called the GNU General Public License. More broadly, the free software movement saw the deal as an attack on one of its core tenets. Under the public license, once open-source code is incorporated into another company's technology, the new product must also be freely available. But the deal also required Novell to pay millions in "royalties" - an indirect admission that Suse Linux contained Microsoft intellectual property and can't be given away for free. "Now it becomes possible to divide and conquer our community," said Eben Moglen, an attorney for the Free Software Foundation, the entity behind the GNU license. By making a pact with Novell, Microsoft also implied that anyone who downloaded or bought Linux from another vendor was doing so illegally. The next version of the GNU license, currently in draft form, aims to stop similar deals. Moglen said the draft states that if a company like Microsoft distributes open-source programs protected by the GNU license, it forfeits any related patent claims. Open-source proponents are frustrated by Microsoft's repeated allusions to patent violations because "they never say what patents being violated, never make any assertions, never put the evidence out there," said Larry Augustin, a technology startup investor who launched SourceForge.net, a prominent open-source development site, in 1999. But Augustin also acknowledged that it's not in Microsoft's interest to do so: Open-source programmers could rewrite their code to avoid infringing on specific patents, or the courts could find that Microsoft's patent isn't valid. An ongoing open-source patent case could indicate that it isn't easy for a software maker to prove infringement. The SCO Group Inc., a Utah-based company, sued IBM Corp. in 2003 for donating its proprietary Unix code to open-source developers. Late last year, a federal judge upheld a decision to dismiss about half of the claims against IBM, agreeing that SCO had failed to identify exactly which lines of code in Linux infringed on its patents. Legal action by Microsoft could also kick off a massive patent war. An organization called the Open Innovation Network, funded by IBM, Red Hat Inc. and others, has amassed a vast number of software patents. If there is a Microsoft lawsuit against open source companies or customers, the OIN would retaliate in kind. "We believe it's highly likely that Microsoft would infringe some of our patents," said Jerry Rosenthal, OIN's chief executive.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_PRISON_REFORM_WAOL-?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT GazetteOnline - AP News Gazette Online - Cedar Rapids, Iowa City, Eastern Iowa Cedar Rapids - IowaCity - Eastern Iowa May 15, 7:04 PM EDT Gregoire signs prison reforms into law OLYMPIA, Wash. (AP) -- A wide-ranging plan to keep criminals from returning to the state's crowded prison system became law Tuesday, with Gov. Chris Gregoire saying treatment and training programs will strike at the roots of crime. The package, estimated to cost about $30 million over the next two years, seeks to help inmates build skills and education while behind bars. It also offers up to half off a prison sentence for those who follow the program. Once they're released, ex-convicts will get help lining up community services. But they also will face stiffer penalties for repeat parole violations. If it's successful, officials say the plan could help cut the next decade's prison capacity shortfall by more than 25 percent. "We cannot continue to build more prisons," Gregoire said Tuesday. "We must address the causes of crime and give former offenders the skills and treatment they need to stay out of prison." The state prison system has been under increasing fire for the "revolving door" of felons. Three law-enforcement officers died at the hands of ex-cons who were under state supervision last year. Washington's prison population stands at about 18,000, including about 2,000 in county jails and out-of-state private facilities. The state pays roughly $27,000 per year to house each of them. The Department of Corrections releases 8,500 ex-cons back into their home communities every year, typically after they've served about two-thirds of their sentences. Officials say four out of 10 ex-convicts commit new crimes within five years. The prison measure signed into law Tuesday tries to stem that flow in several ways: -A major component requires each inmate to have a "re-entry" plan, including education, job training and other needs. Inmates will be able to earn two-year college degrees behind bars if financed by family, outsiders or loans. -The package will link ex-convicts with community services, coordinate tracking by the criminal justice system, and impose stiffer penalties for repeat violations of probation. -Offenders could get their sentences halved if they take part in education, drug treatment and other programs behind bars. The measure had strong support from both political parties in the state Senate, including pushes from Sens. Mike Carrell, R-Lakewood, and Debbie Regala, D-Tacoma. But Republicans in the state House raised objections. Rep. Doug Ericksen, R-Ferndale, said the reform package doesn't hold ex-cons accountable enough for their repeat crimes once they're back on the street. "This is an experiment that distracts us from the real issue of protecting citizens," he said. "If this works, that's great. If this leads to more violent felons being released earlier, then I have problems with that."
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/I/ID_CALDER_SHOOTINGS_WAOL-?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT GazetteOnline - AP News Gazette Online - Cedar Rapids, Iowa City, Eastern Iowa Cedar Rapids - IowaCity - Eastern Iowa May 15, 10:45 AM EDT Autopsy: Calder man shot was four times before committing suicide WALLACE, Idaho (AP) -- An autopsy revealed that a man was shot four times by his wife in a shootout at the family home outside Calder before he committed suicide, Shoshone County authorities said. All told, eleven shots hit four people during the shooting Thursday that left three dead and one in the hospital with a head wound, Sheriff Charles "Chuck" Reynalds said. The lone survivor, Rose Turner, 43, whose parents and estranged husband were found dead at the house about 65 miles east-southeast of Spokane, Wash., remained at Sacred Heart Medical Center in Spokane for treatment of a wound near the eye. "We're hoping for an interview in the future," but authorities don't know how much she'll remember, Reynalds told The Spokesman-Review of Spokane on Monday. "Physically, she's doing well and lots better, but there are some other problems." Turner's father, Fred Smith, 71, was shot three times and her mother, Effie Smith, 68, was shot twice, all the shots coming from a .38-caliber handgun fired by her estranged husband, Rick Turner, believed to be in his early 40s, Reynalds said. Turner's parents were sitting in the living room when they were shot, investigators found. Her husband was hit by four shots from her .22-caliber weapon, one of which "would have been fatal over time," before he killed himself with a shot from his own gun, Reynalds said. In the days before the shooting, Turner told co-workers she feared her husband would kill her. A worried colleague went to the house, discovered the carnage and called the sheriff's office after turner failed to come to work Thursday. Information from: The Spokesman-Review,
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_WASH_JOBLESS_WAOL-?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT GazetteOnline - AP News Gazette Online - Cedar Rapids, Iowa City, Eastern Iowa Cedar Rapids - IowaCity - Eastern Iowa May 15, 2:58 PM EDT WA jobless rate dips to record low 4.4 percent in April By RACHEL LA CORTE OLYMPIA, Wash. (AP) -- Washington's unemployment rate dipped to a record 4.4 percent last month, the lowest since comparable record-keeping more than three decades ago, the state Employment Security Department announced Tuesday. The seasonally adjusted rate was an improvement from the previous month's record low of 4.6 percent. In a prepared statement, Gov. Chris Gregoire said it was "even further proof that our state economy is one of the strongest and fastest-growing in the nation." Economists typically define anything below 5 percent as full employment. The state's employers added about 2,900 net new jobs last month, with the largest growth in professional and business services, with 2,100 new jobs. Construction saw an increase of 900, and other groups, like membership organizations, grew by 500. Manufacturing was down by 900 jobs, financial activities decreased by 100, and government lost 100. More than 64,400 net new jobs were created in Washington from April 2006 to April 2007. Nonfarm jobs increased by 2.3 percent, compared to a national rate of 1.4 percent. The state estimates that about 145,400 people are still unemployed. The national jobless rate is 4.5 percent, a slight increase over March's 4.4 percent and below the 4.7 percent of one year ago. One year ago, Washington's rate was 4.9 percent. Unemployment rates, not seasonally adjusted, in metropolitan areas around the state: Bellingham, 4 percent; Bremerton, 4.2; Longview, 5.9; Mount Vernon-Anacortes, 4.6; Olympia, 4.2; Seattle-Bellevue-Everett, 3.6; Spokane, 4.3; Tacoma, 4.7; Tri-Cities, 5.1; Wenatchee, 5.1; and Yakima, 6.1. These labor market areas also reported: Aberdeen, 7 percent; Centralia, 6.8; Ellensburg, 4.4; Moses Lake, 5.8; Oak Harbor, 4.8; Port Angeles, 5.3; Pullman, 3.4; Shelton, 5.6; and Walla Walla, 4.7. Unemployment rates in these counties were: Adams, 5.1 percent; Asotin, 4.6; Benton, 4.6; Chelan, 5.2; Clark, 5; Columbia, 6.4; Douglas, 4.7; Ferry, 9.2; Franklin, 6.6; Garfield, 4.2; Jefferson, 4.6; King, 3.5; Klickitat, 6.9; Lincoln, 5.1; Okanogan, 6.7; Pacific, 6.6; Pend Oreille, 7; San Juan, 3.3; Skamania, 5.6; Snohomish, 3.8; Stevens, 7.3; and Wahkiakum, 6.5.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/A/ARMY_BOEING_CUTS_WAOL-?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT GazetteOnline - AP News Gazette Online - Cedar Rapids, Iowa City, Eastern Iowa Cedar Rapids - IowaCity - Eastern Iowa May 15, 6:35 PM EDT Pentagon: Proposed cuts to military modernization program would hurt WASHINGTON (AP) -- A congressional threat to slash another 25 percent from next year's budget for a key military modernization program would jeopardize the program, an Army official said Tuesday. Boeing Co. and SAIC Inc., the lead contractors on a multiyear, multibillion-dollar contract to modernize U.S. ground forces, are hoping the Army's protest will convince U.S. lawmakers to reconsider a House Armed Services committee vote last week, recommending that $857 million be cut next year from what the Army says is its most crucial program. The money would be used instead to build a controverial replacement engine for the F-35 Joint Strike Fighter. General Electric Co. and Britain's Rolls-Royce PLC are lead contractors on that deal. Congress must approve any proposed cuts and some lawmakers have criticized the modernization program in the past for cost overruns and failing to meet deadlines although the Senate has voted favorably when funding requests for the program have been on the table. In February, President Bush proposed a $3.4 billion reduction through fiscal 2012 - $680 million a year - to help rein in military spending. If approved, the two cuts would leave $2.8 billion in next year's budget to fund the program, 35 percent below original plans. "If these cuts stand, it will have a material impact to Future Combat Systems. We will be doomed to spend the next 20 to 30 years with the existing combat platform that we have today," Lt. Gen. Stephen Speakes told reporters at a Pentagon briefing Tuesday. The latest proposed cutback would cancel two parts of the program, including manned ground vehicles and a type of unmanned aerial vehicle used for surveillance, Speakes said. Systems engineering would also be targeted, which would set back the Army's efforts to coordinate various programs aimed at helping soldiers in Iraq, Speakes added. Boeing, along with partners Morris Township, N.J.-based Honeywell International Inc., and SAIC, have insisted that stable funding is critical to meeting program requirements. "Repeated funding cuts directly impact the delivery of essential FCS capabilities to our nation's soldiers," said Mary McAdam, a spokeswoman for Boeing Co. The costs of the war in Iraq have forced the military and policymakers into tough budget choices. FCS plans are being trimmed to pay for additional personnel and vehicles, such as the Mine Resistant Ambush Protected unit, needed on the ground in Baghdad. While "we need to ensure that we get funding for MRAPs ... we shouldn't sacrifice the future of America's Army," Speakes said. The Army agrees it needs more than the 2,500 MRAPs already ordered to curb rising death tolls caused by improvised explosive devices used by the enemy in Iraq and Afghanistan. How many more has not been decided although Pentagon officials have met with the Secretary of Defense to discuss funding. Defense analyst Loren Thompson of the Arlington, Va.-based Lexington Institute says the Army sought to make FCS relevant in the global war on terror, but delivery dates extended until 2014 convinced some U.S. lawmakers that there are other ways to provide protection for U.S. soldiers in the near term. "The problem FCS has is that although losing $800 million is a big budget hit, nobody can prove that it is going to hurt a soldier by taking the money out," said Thompson. Shares of Boeing rose 48 cents to $94.82 in extended trading after gaining 78 cents to close at $94.34 in the regular trading session. Shares of SAIC rose 21 cents to end at $18.28 Tuesday and Honeywell shares rose 93 cents to $58.94 in extended trading after falling 69 cents to close the regular trading session at $58.01.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_BOEING_787_WAOL-?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT GazetteOnline - AP News Gazette Online - Cedar Rapids, Iowa City, Eastern Iowa Cedar Rapids - IowaCity - Eastern Iowa May 15, 2:46 PM EDT Boeing superfreighter unloads wings of first 787 By ELIZABETH M. GILLESPIE EVERETT, Wash. (AP) -- An enormous cargo plane Boeing Co. built to fly major components of its new 787 jet delivered wings for the first Dreamliner to its widebody factory here Tuesday. The specially modified 747-400, dubbed the Dreamlifter, landed at Paine Field at 4:10 a.m., nearly 12 hours after it took off from Nagoya, Japan, where Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Co. manufactured the wings. The crew in charge of unloading the wings had them out of the cavernous cargo hold by sunrise. A 118-foot-long cargo loader with 32 wheels pulled up to the Dreamlifter after a support vehicle hooked onto the underside of the aircraft's tail, then slowly opened the rear of the plane as if it were a door. Inside, the two nearly 100-foot-long wings were propped up high near the plane's ceiling, secured by tools that kept them in place during flight. A handful of Boeing workers clapped and cheered as the wings slid onto the platform of the cargo loader, which then whisked them away to the factory in this city north of Seattle where workers will soon begin the final stages of assembling the first 787. To date, Boeing has sold 567 of its midsize, long-haul 787s to 44 customers. The Chicago-based aerospace company said that makes its Dreamliner the fastest-selling new jet in commercial aviation history. Boeing has said the 787, made mostly of light, sturdy carbon-fiber composites, will burn about 20 percent less fuel than comparable jets flying today and will cost less to maintain because composites are more durable than aluminum. Scott Strode, vice president of airplane definition and production for the 787, said a composite wing as large as the 787's has never been built before. The only large section that's left for the Dreamlifter to deliver is the mid-body fuselage, pieces of which are made in Italy and Japan then joined together at Boeing's joint-venture partner Global Aeronautica in Charleston, S.C., Boeing spokesman Mary Hanson said. The plane's nose and two other fuselage sections arrived last Friday, and the horizontal stabilizer - part of the tail - was delivered in late April. Boeing officials say the company remains on track to roll out its first 787 on July 8, the calendar equivalent of 7-8-7. The first test flight is planned for late August, and the plane is expected to enter service in May 2008.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_OBIT_OKE_WAOL-?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT GazetteOnline - AP News Gazette Online - Cedar Rapids, Iowa City, Eastern Iowa Cedar Rapids - IowaCity - Eastern Iowa May 15, 6:03 PM EDT Former Wash. state Sen. Bob Oke dies at 66 OLYMPIA, Wash. (AP) -- Former state Sen. Bob Oke, a senior Republican known for battling the tobacco industry and promoting a new Tacoma Narrows Bridge, has died after a public battle with a rare form of cancer. Colleagues at the Capitol praised his peaceful, upbeat demeanor in the chaotic world of politics, and hailed his work on a variety of issues during his 16-year legislative tenure that followed a long Navy career. Oke, a 16-year veteran of the Senate, died Monday night at the Veterans Administration Hospital in Seattle after a three-year battle against multiple myeloma, which targets plasma cells and weakens the bones, the Senate Republican caucus said. Oke died just weeks before the scheduled July opening of the new bridge linking Tacoma and the Kitsap Peninsula he represented. Oke championed the bridge even though the $800 million toll project was controversial in his 26th District and nearly cost him re-election. State Transportation Secretary Doug MacDonald was on his way to the hospital Tuesday with a symbolic bridge-opening ribbon for Oke to cut before his impending death. The family said he learned of Oke's death shortly before he got to the hospital. Oke, a Port Orchard conservative, was a favorite with lawmakers on both sides of the political aisle before retiring in January, and had been open about his struggles with the disease. He underwent stem-cell transplants twice, as well as chemotherapy and radiation therapy that kept the disease at bay for part of his final four-year term. He had missed part of the 2005 session and sometimes used a wheelchair or cane. He kept his fellow legislators abreast of his illness and various treatments. "A lot of prayer is needed, and I appreciate your support," he told the Senate at one point. "You've always been there for me." The Senate gave him tributes in both 2005 and 2006, with many of his colleagues openly crying. Senate Majority Leader Lisa Brown, D-Spokane, said during one tribute that Oke "greeted each day so courageously." Oke was born in Spokane and reared in West Seattle. He served in the Navy for 26 years, retiring as a senior chief petty officer. He was elected to the Senate in 1990 and re-elected three times. Oke, pronounced Oak, was leader of the natural resources and fisheries panel and worked on transportation issues. He was best known for his staunch support for the new Narrows bridge, which will open in July, and for his efforts to combat youth smoking. His proudest accomplishment was pushing through a ban on free tobacco samples, a bill that was later overturned by a federal judge. "He is definitely going to be missed," Brown said in an interview Tuesday. "We really appreciated working with him on a variety of issues and in particular, I will remember his battle over the tobacco bill." Senate Republican Leader Mike Hewitt of Walla Walla spent a few hours at Oke's bedside before his death. "I had so much respect for Bob," he said. "He was solid as a rock. He had a good moral compass and did what he thought was right, regardless of the political consequences. He thought, for instance, that building the bridge was the right thing to do even though it might result in him losing his seat." Oke's candor about his illness was refreshing, he said. "He brought a calmness to our caucus," Hewitt said. "He was uplifting and I really liked his peaceful way. He only spoke when he needed to, and when he did, people listened." In a posting on Oke's personal Web site after his death, the family said "There are pheasants in heaven!" That was a reference to Oke's passion for pheasant hunting. A year ago, he went hunting with a walker when he was weak. The Legislature last year renamed the state pheasant farm in Lewis County in his honor. "Lots of prayers were offered by so many at his bedside," the family posting said. "He went very peacefully and with no pain." Services will be announced later. He will be buried at the National Veterans Cemetery in Kent.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_OKE_OBIT_WAOL-?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT GazetteOnline - AP News Gazette Online - Cedar Rapids, Iowa City, Eastern Iowa Cedar Rapids - IowaCity - Eastern Iowa May 15, 2:19 PM EDT Former Wash. state Sen. Bob Oke dies at 66 OLYMPIA, Wash. (AP) -- Former state Sen. Bob Oke, a senior Republican known for battling the tobacco industry and promoting a new Tacoma Narrows Bridge, has died after a public battle with a rare form of cancer. Oke, a 16-year veteran of the Senate, died Monday night after a three-year battle against multiple myeloma, which targets plasma cells and weakens the bones, the Senate Republican caucus said. He was 66. The Port Orchard conservative, a favorite with lawmakers on both sides of the political aisle before retiring in January, had been open about his struggles with the disease. He underwent stem-cell transplants twice, as well as chemotherapy and radiation therapy that kept the disease at bay for part of his final four-year term. He had missed part of the 2005 session and sometimes used a wheelchair or cane. He kept his fellow legislators abreast of his illness and various treatments. "A lot of prayer is needed, and I appreciate your support," he told the Senate at one point. "You've always been there for me." The Senate gave him tributes in both 2005 and 2006, with many of his colleagues openly crying. Senate Majority Leader Lisa Brown said during one tribute that Oke "greeted each day so courageously." "If you can address what you're addressing with such courage and grace, we should certainly do the same thing," she said. Oke, 66, a 26-year Navy veteran, was treated at the Veterans' Administration Hospital in Seattle. Oke, pronounced Oak, served four, four-year terms and was a leader of the natural resources and fisheries panel. He was best known for his staunch support for the new Narrows bridge, which will open in a few weeks, and for his efforts to combat youth smoking.
http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/W/WA_SOLDIERS_MEMORIAL_WAOL-?SITE=IACED&SECTION=HOME&TEMPLATE=DEFAULT GazetteOnline - AP News Gazette Online - Cedar Rapids, Iowa City, Eastern Iowa Cedar Rapids - IowaCity - Eastern Iowa May 15, 5:48 PM EDT Fort Lewis remembers 6 soldiers killed in Iraq FORT LEWIS, Wash. (AP) -- Family and comrades gathered Tuesday to honor six Fort Lewis soldiers killed earlier this month in a bombing in Iraq. Hundreds filed into a gym at Soldiers Field House for a late afternoon memorial service. Six sets of sand-colored military boots were placed in memory of Staff Sgt. Vincenzo Romeo, 23, Lodi, N.J.; Cpl. Matthew Alexander, 21, of Gretna, Neb.; Cpl. Michael Pursel, 19, Clinton, Utah; Cpl. Anthony Bradshaw, 21, of San Antonio, Texas; Sgt. Joel W. Lewis, 28, Sandia Park, N.M., and Sgt. Jason R. Harkins, 25, of Clarkesville, Ga. The group of soldiers was killed May 6 when a bomb exploded beneath their Stryker vehicle in the city of Baqubah, northeast of Baghdad. All were assigned to the 3rd Brigade, 2nd Infantry Division's 5th Battalion, 20th Infantry Regiment, which has been in Iraq since last June. Also killed was Russian photojournalist, Dmitry Chebotayev, 29. It was the largest death toll taken of a Fort Lewis unit in one attack since six soldiers with the 1st Stryker Brigade, 25th Infantry Division were killed in a suicide bombing on Dec. 21, 2004, at a dining tent in Mosul. As of Tuesday, Fort Lewis has lost at least 108 soldiers since the war began in Iraq in March 2003. Of those, more than 45 were from the 3rd Brigade.
